It does not matter how slowly you go as long as you do not stop.

Confucius

 

Motivational You Stop Matter Go

If you're not hopeful and optimistic, then you just give up. You have to take the long hard look and just believe that if you're consistent, you will succeed.

John Lewis

 

You Believe Look Will

Three things cannot be long hidden: the sun, the moon, and the truth.

Buddha

 

Truth Sun Moon Three

We can do anything we want to if we stick to it long enough.

Helen Keller

 

Enough Want Anything Stick

Do all the good you can, by all the means you can, in all the ways you can, in all the places you can, at all the times you can, to all the people you can, as long as ever you can.

John Wesley

 

Good You People Places

Security is mostly a superstition. It does not exist in nature, nor do the children of men as a whole experience it. Avoiding danger is no safer in the long run than outright exposure. Life is either a daring adventure, or nothing.

Helen Keller

 

Life Nature Experience Men

There are only two forces in the world, the sword and the spirit. In the long run the sword will always be conquered by the spirit.

Napoleon Bonaparte

 

World Always Sword Will

There are risks and costs to action. But they are far less than the long range risks of comfortable inaction.

John F. Kennedy

 

Chance Risks Action Inaction

Whoever fights monsters should see to it that in the process he does not become a monster. And if you gaze long enough into an abyss, the abyss will gaze back into you.

Friedrich Nietzsche

 

You Will Enough Back

As long as you're going to be thinking anyway, think big.

Donald Trump

 

You Thinking Think Big Think Big

Top 10
Long
QUOTES

View the list

Men go abroad to wonder at the heights of mountains, at the huge waves of the sea, at the long courses of the rivers, at the vast compass of the ocean, at the circular motions of the stars, and they pass by themselves without wondering.

Saint Augustine

 

Sea Stars Men Go

Deep into that darkness peering, long I stood there, wondering, fearing, doubting, dreaming dreams no mortal ever dared to dream before.

Edgar Allan Poe

 

Dreams Darkness Dream Deep

The great enemy of clear language is insincerity. When there is a gap between one's real and one's declared aims, one turns, as it were, instinctively to long words and exhausted idioms, like a cuttlefish squirting out ink.

George Orwell

 

Great Words Enemy Real

If you want to build a ship, don't drum up people to collect wood and don't assign them tasks and work, but rather teach them to long for the endless immensity of the sea.

Antoine de Saint-Exupery

 

Work Sea You People

I would fight for my liberty so long as my strength lasted, and if the time came for me to go, the Lord would let them take me.

Harriet Tubman

 

Strength Me Time Fight

Words are more powerful than some noises. Noises won't last long. Lyrics are so important, and people don't realise that.

Billie Eilish

 

People Words Important More

The simple act of paying attention can take you a long way.

Keanu Reeves

 

Simple You Way Attention

Justice should remove the bandage from her eyes long enough to distinguish between the vicious and the unfortunate.

Robert Green Ingersoll

 

Eyes Justice Enough Remove

My fellow Americans, our long national nightmare is over.

Gerald R. Ford

 

National Over Our Nightmare

The obligation of subjects to the sovereign is understood to last as long, and no longer, than the power lasteth by which he is able to protect them.

Thomas Hobbes

 

Power He Protect Last

You know, if I listened to Michael Dukakis long enough, I would be convinced we're in an economic downturn and people are homeless and going without food and medical attention and that we've got to do something about the unemployed.

Ronald Reagan

 

You Food People Medical

Those who deny freedom to others deserve it not for themselves; and under the rule of a just God, cannot long retain it.

Abraham Lincoln

 

God Freedom Who Deserve

The duty of rhetoric is to deal with such matters as we deliberate upon without arts or systems to guide us, in the hearing of persons who cannot take in at a glance a complicated argument or follow a long chain of reasoning.

Aristotle

 

Duty Follow Who Complicated

Character, in the long run, is the decisive factor in the life of an individual and of nations alike.

Theodore Roosevelt

 

Life Character Run Individual

We choose our joys and sorrows long before we experience them.

Khalil Gibran

 

Experience Choose Before Our Them

The battle for the individual rights of women is one of long standing and none of us should countenance anything which undermines it.

Eleanor Roosevelt

The fight is won or lost far away from witnesses - behind the lines, in the gym, and out there on the road, long before I dance under those lights.

Muhammad Ali

 

Fight Dance Road Gym

Look for yourself, and you will find in the long run only hatred, loneliness, despair, rage, ruin, and decay. But look for Christ, and you will find Him, and with Him everything else thrown in.

C. S. Lewis

 

You Yourself Loneliness Look

Time abides long enough for those who make use of it.

Leonardo da Vinci

 

Time Enough Who Make Use

I became insane, with long intervals of horrible sanity.

Edgar Allan Poe

 

Sanity Horrible Insane Became

Disneyland will never be completed. It will continue to grow as long as there is imagination left in the world.

Walt Disney

 

World Imagination Grow Never

I learned a long time ago that reality was much weirder than anyone's imagination.

Hunter S. Thompson

 

Time Imagination Reality Long Time

I'm not concerned with people seeing me in a certain way. Some people see me as a kid, some people see me as an adult. But I'm seriously not going to complain how anybody sees me, as long as they see me.

Taylor Swift

 

Me People Way See

You only have to do a very few things right in your life so long as you don't do too many things wrong.

Warren Buffett

 

Life You Things Wrong

Someone is sitting in the shade today because someone planted a tree a long time ago.

Warren Buffett

 

Inspirational Today Tree Time Shade

We long for an affection altogether ignorant of our faults. Heaven has accorded this to us in the uncritical canine attachment.

George Eliot

 

Heaven Pet Affection Us

I listened, motionless and still; And, as I mounted up the hill, The music in my heart I bore, Long after it was heard no more.

William Wordsworth

 

Music Heart Hill More

A man can be himself only so long as he is alone, and if he does not love solitude, he will not love freedom, for it is only when he is alone that he is really free.

Arthur Schopenhauer

 

Love Alone Freedom Man

As long as you know men are like children, you know everything!

Coco Chanel

 

You Men Children Know Like

I'm cool with failing so long as I know that there are people around me that love me unconditionally.

Dave Chappelle

 

Love Cool Me People

Here at home, when Americans were standing in long lines to give blood after the attack on the World Trade Center and the Pentagon, we squandered an obvious opportunity to make service a noble cause again, and rekindle an American spirit of community.

Joe Biden

 

World Home Opportunity Community

In the long run, the sharpest weapon of all is a kind and gentle spirit.

Anne Frank

 

Gentle Spirit Kind Weapon Long Run

I've studied authoritarianism for a very long time - for 40 years - and they're started by people's attempts to control the ideological and linguistic territory.

Jordan Peterson

 

Time People Long Time Control

I have learned that as long as I hold fast to my beliefs and values - and follow my own moral compass - then the only expectations I need to live up to are my own.

Michelle Obama

 

Live Expectations Follow My Own

It is not necessary that whilst I live I live happily; but it is necessary that so long as I live I should live honourably.

Immanuel Kant

 

Live Necessary Should Happily

It's so long since I've had sex I've forgotten who ties up who.

Joan Rivers

 

Sex Who Up Forgotten

The things we truly love stay with us always, locked in our hearts as long as life remains.

Josephine Baker

 

Life Love Always Stay Things

I've worked too hard and too long to let anything stand in the way of my goals. I will not let my teammates down and I will not let myself down.

Mia Hamm

 

Motivational Myself Goals Way

I don't mind sitting at home playing the guitar for a year as long as I'm making good films.

Tom Holland

 

Good Guitar Home Mind

So long as the system of competition in the production and exchange of the means of life goes on, the degradation of the arts will go on; and if that system is to last for ever, then art is doomed, and will surely die; that is to say, civilization will die.

William Morris

 

Life Art Go Competition

It's hard to write haiku. I write long, silly Indian poems.

Jack Kerouac

 

Hard Silly Indian I Write

How long was I in the army? Five foot eleven.

Spike Milligan

Treachery has existed as long as there's been warfare, and there's always been a few people that you couldn't trust.

Jim Mattis

 

You People Trust Always

I love criticism just so long as it's unqualified praise.

Noel Coward

 

Love Praise Criticism Just

The only sense that is common in the long run, is the sense of change and we all instinctively avoid it.

E. B. White

 

Change Only Avoid Sense

The notion that the public accepts or rejects anything in modern art is merely romantic fiction. The game is completed and the trophies distributed long before the public knows what has happened.

Tom Wolfe

 

Art Game Romantic Anything

Now science has presented us with a hope called stem cell research, which may provide our scientists with many answers that have for so long been beyond our grasp.

Nancy Reagan

 

Hope Science Research Beyond

I won't have to do any major changes to continue my career a long way, hopefully. Just hopefully stay healthy and be able to help a team out as I go through and still play at a pretty high level.

Stephen Curry

 

Go Way Stay High

We all have our own life to pursue, our own kind of dream to be weaving, and we all have the power to make wishes come true, as long as we keep believing.

Louisa May Alcott

 

Life Power True Dream

I have loved movies as the number one thing in my life so long that I can't ever remember a time when I didn't.

Quentin Tarantino

 

Life Time My Life Remember

The sun, the moon and the stars would have disappeared long ago... had they happened to be within the reach of predatory human hands.

Havelock Ellis

 

Nature Stars Sun Moon

I was doing without for so long, not knowing the things that are normal for musicians. I was getting bookings regardless, people phoning or emailing me direct, and journalists were writing about me anyway.

Stormzy

 

Me People Getting Doing

I don't mind if my skull ends up on a shelf as long as it's got my name on it.

Debbie Harry

 

Mind Name Skull Up

It's just not right that so many things don't work when they should. I don't think that will change for a long time.

Steve Wozniak

 

Work Change Time Long Time

I am a free lover. I have an inalienable, constitutional and natural right to love whom I may, to love as long or short a period as I can; to change that love every day if I please.

Victoria Woodhull

 

Love Change Day I Am

It doesn't matter if a cat is black or white, so long as it catches mice.

Deng Xiaoping

 

Matter Black White Cat Mice

I see the beauty in boxing. It teaches me strength physically, but mostly mentally. I had to learn my strength, because for so long I could have been tougher than I was.

Kelly Rowland

 

Beauty Strength Me See

I'm very happy with where I arrived, both personally and professionally. I can say more so personally, because my career will have to end eventually. I do not know how long it will be, but eventually it will end, and the personal will continue.

Kaka

 

Happy Will End Know

For the theatre one needs long arms... an artiste with short arms can never make a fine gesture.

Sarah Bernhardt

 

Never Fine Theatre Needs

Don't think about anything for too long. Even if it's off-the-wall, go for it. You'll have a lot more fun in life.

Chelsea Handler

 

Life You Go Think

I am not a person who reaches for the moon as long as I have the stars.

Gertrude Ederle

 

Stars I Am Moon Person

To me, the sea is like a person - like a child that I've known a long time. It sounds crazy, I know, but when I swim in the sea, I talk to it. I never feel alone when I'm out there.

Gertrude Ederle

 

Alone Sea Me Time

So long as the human spirit thrives on this planet, music in some living form will accompany and sustain it and give it expressive meaning.

Aaron Copland

 

Music Will Spirit Human

I don't care who does the electing, so long as I get to do the nominating.

Boss Tweed

 

Care Who don't Care Get

Some people think architecture is about the genius sketch; I don't. Great architecture is a collaboration among a lot of people over a long period of time.

Joshua Prince-Ramus

 

Time Great People Architecture

I will keep playing as long as my body lets me, and as long as I'm wanted by my listeners. Because music is the only thing that keeps me going.

Ravi Shankar

 

Me Music Body Will

My scientific studies have afforded me great gratification; and I am convinced that it will not be long before the whole world acknowledges the results of my work.

Gregor Mendel

 

Work Me Great World

Owing to the difficulty of dealing with substances of high molecular weight we are still a long way from having determined the chemical characteristics and the constitution of proteins, which are regarded as the principal con-stituents of living organisms.

Karl Landsteiner

 

Way Constitution High Principal

As long as I can make an audience feel something, I don't care whether it's a good thing or bad thing, just to feel something is important to me. Elisha Cuthbert Good Me Feel Care Sometimes it takes us a long time to build up songs, and we really work the structures over and over and build in lots of noisy parts. Lee Ranaldo Work Time Long Time Sometimes A lot of people don't believe in me. They think I'm too small for heavyweight. Just like a lot of people told me long ago that I shouldn't box. That I wasn't going to make it. I just knock my head and say I'm capable. I can do it. Oleksandr Usyk Me People Believe Think I can remember when, as a beginner, I was delighted with any ball as long as it would bounce. Helen Wills Moody Remember I Can Bounce Ball Writing can't change the world overnight, but writing may have an enormous effect over time, over the long haul. Leslie Marmon Silko Change Time World Change The World We are tired of being beaten by policemen. We are tired of seeing our people locked up in jails over and over again. And then you holler, 'Be patient.' How long can we be patient? John Lewis You People Tired Patient Soap and education are not as sudden as a massacre, but they are more deadly in the long run. Mark Twain Education More Soap Deadly Victory at all costs, victory in spite of all terror, victory however long and hard the road may be; for without victory, there is no survival. Winston Churchill Victory Road Survival Hard A state of society where men may not speak their minds cannot long endure. Winston Churchill Society Men Speak Endure Cannot Buy what thou hast no need of and ere long thou shalt sell thy necessities. Benjamin Franklin Need Buy Thou Sell For having lived long, I have experienced many instances of being obliged, by better information or fuller consideration, to change opinions, even on important subjects, which I once thought right but found to be otherwise. Benjamin Franklin Change Better Information Important A man is what he thinks about all day long. Ralph Waldo Emerson Man Day He About Thinks As long as a man stands in his own way, everything seems to be in his way. Ralph Waldo Emerson Man Way Everything Own The health of the eye seems to demand a horizon. We are never tired, so long as we can see far enough. Ralph Waldo Emerson Health Tired Horizon Never America is a poem in our eyes; its ample geography dazzles the imagination, and it will not wait long for metres. Ralph Waldo Emerson Eyes Imagination Wait America We have listened too long to the courtly Muses of Europe. Ralph Waldo Emerson Europe Too Muses Listened As long as war is regarded as wicked, it will always have its fascination. When it is looked upon as vulgar, it will cease to be popular. Oscar Wilde War Always Will Wicked If you are not too long, I will wait here for you all my life. Oscar Wilde Life You Romantic My Life Wait As long as a woman can look ten years younger than her own daughter, she is perfectly satisfied. Oscar Wilde Look Woman Daughter Satisfied A man can be happy with any woman, as long as he does not love her. Oscar Wilde Love Man Woman Happy I long, as does every human being, to be at home wherever I find myself. Maya Angelou Myself Home Human Find Human Being My life has been long, and believing that life loves the liver of it, I have dared to try many things, sometimes trembling, but daring still. Maya Angelou Life My Life Sometimes Try Growing up, I decided, a long time ago, I wouldn't accept any manmade differences between human beings, differences made at somebody else's insistence or someone else's whim or convenience. Maya Angelou Time Long Time Accept Differences I learned a long time ago the wisest thing I can do is be on my own side, be an advocate for myself and others like me. Maya Angelou Myself Me Time Experience I'm convinced of this: Good done anywhere is good done everywhere. For a change, start by speaking to people rather than walking by them like they're stones that don't matter. As long as you're breathing, it's never too late to do some good. Maya Angelou Good Change You People I long for the time when all human history is taught as one history, because it really is. Maya Angelou
Read more at https://www.brainyquote.com/topics/long-quotes_4

In a long meter hymn, a singer - they call it 'lays out a line.' And then the whole church joins in in repeating that line. And they form a wall of harmony so tight, you can't wedge a pin between it.

Maya Angelou

 

You Church Harmony Singer

My grandmother took me to church on Sunday all day long, every Sunday into the night. Then Monday evening was the missionary meeting. Tuesday evening was usher board meeting. Wednesday evening was prayer meeting. Thursday evening was visit the sick. Friday evening was choir practice. I mean, and at all those gatherings, we sang.

Maya Angelou

 

Me Prayer Day Evening

Fighting for one's freedom, struggling towards being free, is like struggling to be a poet or a good Christian or a good Jew or a good Muslim or good Zen Buddhist. You work all day long and achieve some kind of level of success by nightfall, go to sleep and wake up the next morning with the job still to be done. So you start all over again.

Maya Angelou

 

Work Success Good Freedom

Surround yourself with the best people you can find, delegate authority, and don't interfere as long as the policy you've decided upon is being carried out.

Ronald Reagan

 

Best You Yourself People

Without God, democracy will not and cannot long endure.

Ronald Reagan

 

God Democracy Will Endure Cannot

Heaven is long-enduring, and earth continues long. The reason why heaven and earth are able to endure and continue thus long is because they do not live of, or for, themselves.

Lao Tzu

 

Heaven Earth Live Reason

If you keep feeling a point that has been sharpened, the point cannot long preserve its sharpness.

Lao Tzu

 

You Feeling Point Cannot

Be content with what you are, and wish not change; nor dread your last day, nor long for it.

Marcus Aurelius

 

Change You Day Wish

What Englishman will give his mind to politics as long as he can afford to keep a motor car?

George Bernard Shaw

 

Politics Car Mind Will

I learned long ago, never to wrestle with a pig. You get dirty, and besides, the pig likes it.

George Bernard Shaw

 

Learning You Never Pig Dirty

Clever and attractive women do not want to vote; they are willing to let men govern as long as they govern men.

George Bernard Shaw

 

Women Men Want Vote

Man can climb to the highest summits, but he cannot dwell there long.

George Bernard Shaw

 

Man Climb Dwell Cannot

Every one desires to live long, but no one would be old.

Abraham Lincoln

 

Live Old Every Would Desires

Standing as I do, with my hand upon this staff, and under the folds of the American flag, I ask you to stand by me so long as I stand by it.

Abraham Lincoln

 

Me You Stand Standing

I understand a ship to be made for the carrying and preservation of the cargo, and so long as the ship can be saved, with the cargo, it should never be abandoned. This Union likewise should never be abandoned unless it fails and the possibility of its preservation shall cease to exist, without throwing passengers and cargo overboard.

Abraham Lincoln

 

Never Ship Understand Without

He who would be no slave must consent to have no slave. Those who deny freedom to others deserve it not for themselves and, under a just God, cannot long retain it.

Abraham Lincoln

 

God Freedom Who Deserve

We are not angry with people we fear or respect, as long as we fear or respect them; you cannot be afraid of a person and also at the same time angry with him.

Aristotle

 

You Time Angry People

The cost of a thing is the amount of what I will call life which is required to be exchanged for it, immediately or in the long run.

Henry David Thoreau

 

Life Will Call Cost

In the long run, men hit only what they aim at. Therefore, they had better aim at something high.

Henry David Thoreau

 

Men Aim Better High

Every man casts a shadow; not his body only, but his imperfectly mingled spirit. This is his grief. Let him turn which way he will, it falls opposite to the sun; short at noon, long at eve. Did you never see it?

Henry David Thoreau

 

Shadow You Man Sun

Nature puts no question and answers none which we mortals ask. She has long ago taken her resolution.

Henry David Thoreau

 

Nature Question She Answers

I long to accomplish a great and noble task, but it is my chief duty to accomplish small tasks as if they were great and noble.

Helen Keller

 

Great Duty Noble Task

Avoiding danger is no safer in the long run than outright exposure. The fearful are caught as often as the bold.

Helen Keller

 

Fear Bold Danger Avoiding

So long as the memory of certain beloved friends lives in my heart, I shall say that life is good.

Helen Keller

 

Life Good Heart Moving On Memory

Everything is funny, as long as it's happening to somebody else.

Will Rogers

 

Funny Humor Everything Else

Death is caused by swallowing small amounts of saliva over a long period of time.

George Carlin

 

Death Time Small

​

Superstition is to religion what astrology is to astronomy the mad daughter of a wise mother. These daughters have too long dominated the earth. Voltaire Wise Religion Daughter Mother Such is the feebleness of humanity, such is its perversity, that doubtless it is better for it to be subject to all possible superstitions, as long as they are not murderous, than to live without religion. Voltaire Religion Humanity Better Live In the long history of the world, only a few generations have been granted the role of defending freedom in its hour of maximum danger. I do not shrink from this responsibility - I welcome it. John F. Kennedy History Freedom World Welcome Khrushchev reminds me of the tiger hunter who has picked a place on the wall to hang the tiger's skin long before he has caught the tiger. This tiger has other ideas. John F. Kennedy Me Skin Tiger Place In Vegas, I got into a long argument with the man at the roulette wheel over what I considered to be an odd number. Steven Wright Man Wheel Argument Got If you're going to have to swallow a frog, you don't want to have to look at that sucker too long! Zig Ziglar You Look Frog Want Athletic skills are acquired over a long period of time and after countless hours of practice. Zig Ziglar Time Practice Skills Over We do not hate as long as we still attach a lesser value, but only when we attach an equal or a greater value. Friedrich Nietzsche Hate Value Only Equal If I had no sense of humor, I would long ago have committed suicide. Mahatma Gandhi Humor Suicide No Sense Sense Of Humor My only fear is that I may live too long. This would be a subject of dread to me. Thomas Jefferson Me Fear Live Only Books constitute capital. A library book lasts as long as a house, for hundreds of years. It is not, then, an article of mere consumption but fairly of capital, and often in the case of professional men, setting out in life, it is their only capital. Thomas Jefferson Life Men House Professional If our soldiers are not overburdened with money, it is not because they have a distaste for riches; if their lives are not unduly long, it is not because they are disinclined to longevity. Sun Tzu Money Soldiers Longevity Because I know war as few other men now living know it, and nothing to me is more revolting. I have long advocated its complete abolition, as its very destructiveness on both friend and foe has rendered it useless as a method of settling international disputes. Ernest Hemingway Me War Men Nothing For a long time now I have tried simply to write the best I can. Sometimes I have good luck and write better than I can. Ernest Hemingway Best Good Time Better There is no hunting like the hunting of man, and those who have hunted armed men long enough and liked it, never care for anything else thereafter. Ernest Hemingway Man War Men Never Nobody, as long as he moves about among the chaotic currents of life, is without trouble. Carl Jung Life Nobody Trouble About What is ominous is the ease with which some people go from saying that they don't like something to saying that the government should forbid it. When you go down that road, don't expect freedom to survive very long. Thomas Sowell Freedom You People Government The time is long overdue to stop looking for progress through racial or ethnic leaders. Such leaders have too many incentives to promote polarizing attitudes and actions that are counterproductive for minorities and disastrous for the country. Thomas Sowell Time Stop Progress Looking The theory seems to be that as long as a man is a failure he is one of God's children, but that as soon as he succeeds he is taken over by the Devil. H. L. Mencken God Failure Man Devil Man weeps to think that he will die so soon; woman, that she was born so long ago. H. L. Mencken Man Die Woman Think No matter how long he lives, no man ever becomes as wise as the average woman of forty-eight. H. L. Mencken Wise Man Matter Woman Getting older is no problem. You just have to live long enough. Groucho Marx You Getting Getting Older Live Just I have an attention span that's as long as it has to be. Donald Trump Attention Attention Span Span The problems we face now - poverty and violence at home, war and destruction abroad - will last only as long as we continue relying on the same politicians who created them in the first place. Donald Trump War Face Home Problems In America, we understand that a nation is only living as long as it is striving. Donald Trump America Nation Understand Only This is a pandemic. I felt it was a pandemic long before it was called a pandemic. Donald Trump
Read more at https://www.brainyquote.com/topics/long-quotes_6

​

Any fool can destroy trees. They cannot run away; and if they could, they would still be destroyed - chased and hunted down as long as fun or a dollar could be got out of their bark hides, branching horns, or magnificent bole backbones.

John Muir

 

Fool Down Fun Trees

The engineering is long gone in most PC companies. In the consumer electronics companies, they don't understand the software parts of it. And so you really can't make the products that you can make at Apple anywhere else right now. Apple's the only company that has everything under one roof.

Steve Jobs

 

You Everything Understand Right

The desktop metaphor was invented because one, you were a stand-alone device, and two, you had to manage your own storage. That's a very big thing in a desktop world. And that may go away. You may not have to manage your own storage. You may not store much before too long.

Steve Jobs

 

You World Go Big

I'm sorry, it's true. Having children really changes your view on these things. We're born, we live for a brief instant, and we die. It's been happening for a long time. Technology is not changing it much - if at all.

Steve Jobs

 

Time Technology View Die

It's not the tools that you have faith in - tools are just tools. They work, or they don't work. It's people you have faith in or not. Yeah, sure, I'm still optimistic I mean, I get pessimistic sometimes but not for long.

Steve Jobs

 

Work Faith You People

If one by one we counted people out For the least sin, it wouldn't take us long To get so we had no one left to live with. For to be social is to be forgiving.

Robert Frost

 

People Live Sin Us

It ain't no sin if you crack a few laws now and then, just so long as you don't break any.

Mae West

 

You Sin Now And Then Now

Say what you want about long dresses, but they cover a multitude of shins.

Mae West

 

You Want About Say

Don't keep a man guessing too long - he's sure to find the answer somewhere else.

Mae West

 

Man Somewhere Find He

I got family members that's police officers. I don't got no problem if you a cop, as long as y'all doing y'all job, and y'all not harassing.

Juice Wrld

 

Family You Police Job

In my entire life, any time I've ever lost something, I've gotten something even better going around the next corner. It's like one door closes and another door opens. As long as I can walk through the produce section in every grocery store in this country and eat the grapes that they're going to throw away, I know I can be fine.

Wayne Dyer

 

Life Walk Time Better

True glory takes root, and even spreads; all false pretences, like flowers, fall to the ground; nor can any counterfeit last long.

Marcus Tullius Cicero

 

Flowers True Glory Fall

You must become an old man in good time if you wish to be an old man long.

Marcus Tullius Cicero

 

Good You Man Time

The long time to come when I shall not exist has more effect on me than this short present time, which nevertheless seems endless.

Marcus Tullius Cicero

 

Me Time Long Time More

Truth is mysterious, elusive, always to be conquered. Liberty is dangerous, as hard to live with as it is elating. We must march toward these two goals, painfully but resolutely, certain in advance of our failings on so long a road.

Albert Camus

 

Truth Goals Road Always

Forget not that the earth delights to feel your bare feet and the winds long to play with your hair.

Khalil Gibran

 

Nature Hair Feet Feel Earth

And forget not that the earth delights to feel your bare feet and the winds long to play with your hair.

Khalil Gibran

 

Gardening Hair Feet Feel

It takes a long time to bring the past up to the present.

Franklin D. Roosevelt

 

Time Past Long Time Present

In the long run, we shape our lives, and we shape ourselves. The process never ends until we die. And the choices we make are ultimately our own responsibility.

Eleanor Roosevelt

 

Responsibility Die Never Choices

Error is acceptable as long as we are young; but one must not drag it along into old age.

Johann Wolfgang von Goethe

 

Age Old Age Old Must

I want my friend to miss me as long as I miss him.

Saint Augustine

 

Friendship Me Friend Want

If any of you should ask me for an epitome of the Christian religion, I should say that it is in one word - prayer. Live and die without prayer, and you will pray long enough when you get to hell.

Charles Spurgeon

 

Me Prayer You Religion

We have lived long enough to experience the hollowness of earth and the rottenness of all carnal promises.

Charles Spurgeon

 

Experience Promises Earth Enough

I believe that some of us who were kept by God a long while before we found Him love Him better perhaps than we should have done if we had received Him directly, and we can preach better to others - we can speak more of His loving-kindness and tender mercy.

Charles Spurgeon

 

Love God Believe Better

I know I got it made while the masses of black people are catchin' hell, but as long as they ain't free, I ain't free.

Muhammad Ali

 

People Hell Black Free

You know, it's not the world that was my oppressor, because what the world does to you, if the world does it to you long enough and effectively enough, you begin to do to yourself.

James Baldwin

 

You Yourself World Oppressor

​

So long as men worship the Caesars and Napoleons, Caesars and Napoleons will duly arise and make them miserable.

Aldous Huxley

 

Men Will Miserable Worship

A child-like man is not a man whose development has been arrested; on the contrary, he is a man who has given himself a chance of continuing to develop long after most adults have muffled themselves in the cocoon of middle-aged habit and convention.

Aldous Huxley

 

Man Chance Who Habit

It is very important to generate a good attitude, a good heart, as much as possible. From this, happiness in both the short term and the long term for both yourself and others will come.

Dalai Lama

 

Attitude Good Happiness Heart

As long as I am alive, I am fully committed to amity between Tibetans and Chinese. Otherwise there's no use.

Dalai Lama

 

I Am Alive Between Use

I think really, China, Chinese, I think they really have a long history of civilization, rich culture.

Dalai Lama

 

History Culture Rich Think

It is difficult to violently suppress people in the long run, as the example of the Soviet Union and the Eastern European countries has shown.

Dalai Lama

 

People Difficult Example European

I feel exhausted if I teach too long.

Dalai Lama

 

Feel Exhausted I Feel Teach

I am sometimes sad when I hear the personal stories of Tibetan refugees who have been tortured or beaten. Some irritation, some anger comes. But it never lasts long. I always try to think at a deeper level, to find ways to console.

Dalai Lama

 

Sad Anger I Am Never

Hold a picture of yourself long and steadily enough in your mind's eye, and you will be drawn toward it.

Napoleon Hill

 

You Yourself Mind Will

A soldier will fight long and hard for a bit of colored ribbon.

Napoleon Bonaparte

 

Patriotism Fight Will Soldier Hard

You can't get a cup of tea big enough or a book long enough to suit me.

C. S. Lewis

 

Happiness Me You Tea

The long, dull, monotonous years of middle-aged prosperity or middle-aged adversity are excellent campaigning weather for the devil.

C. S. Lewis

 

Weather Devil Adversity Prosperity

Long before history began we men have got together apart from the women and done things. We had time.

C. S. Lewis

 

History Women Time Together

Always prefer the plain direct word to the long, vague one. Don't implement promises, but keep them.

C. S. Lewis

 

Always Promises Keep Vague

We are not living in a world where all roads are radii of a circle and where all, if followed long enough, will therefore draw gradually nearer and finally meet at the centre: rather in a world where every road, after a few miles, forks into two, and each of those into two again, and at each fork, you must make a decision.

C. S. Lewis

 

You World Decision Roads

Nonviolence is fine as long as it works.

Malcolm X

 

Fine Nonviolence Works

Somebody asked me - you know, how come it took you so long to win a national championship? And I said, 'I'm a slow learner; but you notice when I learn something, I have it down pretty good.'

John Wooden

 

Good Me You Win

Life well spent is long.

Leonardo da Vinci

 

Life Well Spent

Time stays long enough for anyone who will use it.

Leonardo da Vinci

 

Time Will Enough Who Stays

The divisions of Perspective are 3, as used in drawing; of these, the first includes the diminution in size of opaque objects; the second treats of the diminution and loss of outline in such opaque objects; the third, of the diminution and loss of colour at long distances.

Leonardo da Vinci

 

Drawing Perspective Loss First

And I will do everything that I can as long as I am President of the United States to remind the American people that we are one nation under God, and we may call that God different names but we remain one nation.

Barack Obama

 

God People I Am Will

Cutting the deficit by gutting our investments in innovation and education is like lightening an overloaded airplane by removing its engine. It may make you feel like you're flying high at first, but it won't take long before you feel the impact.

Barack Obama

 

Education You Feel Innovation

What I think is fair to say is that, coming out of the Republican camp, there have been efforts to suggest that perhaps I'm not who I say I am when it comes to my faith - something which I find deeply offensive, and that has been going on for a pretty long time.

Barack Obama

 

Faith Time I Am Long Time

So long as I'm Commander-in-Chief, we will sustain the strongest military the world has ever known. When you take off the uniform, we will serve you as well as you've served us - because no one who fights for this country should have to fight for a job, or a roof over their head, or the care that they need when they come home.

Barack Obama

 

You World Home Fight

No party has a monopoly on wisdom. No democracy works without compromise. But when Governor Romney and his allies in Congress tell us we can somehow lower our deficit by spending trillions more on new tax breaks for the wealthy - well, you do the math. I refuse to go along with that. And as long as I'm President, I never will.

Barack Obama

 

Wisdom You Democracy Go

It's one of the few regrets of my presidency - that the rancor and suspicion between the parties has gotten worse instead of better. There's no doubt a president with the gifts of Lincoln or Roosevelt might have better bridged the divide, and I guarantee I'll keep trying to be better so long as I hold this office.

Barack Obama

​

​

We're not a fragile people. We're not a frightful people. Our power doesn't come from some self-declared savior promising that he alone can restore order as long as we do things his way. We don't look to be ruled.

Barack Obama

 

Alone Power People Look

A long habit of not thinking a thing wrong gives it a superficial appearance of being right.

Thomas Paine

 

Wisdom Thinking Habit Appearance

In the long years liker they must grow; The man be more of woman, she of man.

Alfred Lord Tennyson

 

Man Woman Grow More

I'm an introvert... I love being by myself, love being outdoors, love taking a long walk with my dogs and looking at the trees, flowers, the sky.

Audrey Hepburn

 

Love Sky Myself Walk

Don't worry about your heart, it will last you as long as you live.

W. C. Fields

 

Heart You Will Live

So long as the universe had a beginning, we could suppose it had a creator. But if the universe is really completely self-contained, having no boundary or edge, it would have neither beginning nor end: it would simply be. What place, then, for a creator?

Stephen Hawking

 

Universe Beginning End Place

I think we have a good chance of surviving long enough to colonize the solar system.

Stephen Hawking

 

Good Chance Think Enough

We may find in the long run that tinned food is a deadlier weapon than the machine-gun.

George Orwell

 

Food Find Weapon May

Death to me means nothing as long as I can die fast.

Bob Dylan

 

Death Me Die Nothing

Any colour - so long as it's black.

Henry Ford

 

Black Colour Any

You'll never get ahead of anyone as long as you try to get even with him.

Lou Holtz

 

You Ahead Never Try

I haven't slept for ten days, because that would be too long.

Mitch Hedberg

 

Days Because Ten Would

I have been practicing archery for a long time; a bow and arrow helps me to unwind.

Paulo Coelho

 

Me Time Long Time Unwind

I believe that, as long as there is plenty, poverty is evil.

Robert Kennedy

 

Believe Poverty Evil I Believe

In the long run, a flexible sentencing procedure which works to rehabilitate offenders offers the best hope in the majority of cases in the Federal courts.

Robert Kennedy

 

Best Hope Majority Flexible

Science began as one of the noblest expressions of man's reason. It will continue to serve humanity so long as it never forgets that human beings remain the heart of its purpose.

Robert Kennedy

 

Science Heart Man Humanity

Just as in earthly life lovers long for the moment when they are able to breathe forth their love for each other, to let their souls blend in a soft whisper, so the mystic longs for the moment when in prayer he can, as it were, creep into God.

Soren Kierkegaard

 

Life Love God Prayer

Since my earliest childhood a barb of sorrow has lodged in my heart. As long as it stays I am ironic if it is pulled out I shall die.

Soren Kierkegaard

 

Heart Childhood I Am Die

The present letter is a very long one, simply because I had no leisure to make it shorter.

Blaise Pascal

 

Leisure Present Simply Because

Among a people generally corrupt liberty cannot long exist.

Edmund Burke

 

People Liberty Cannot Exist

I venture to say no war can be long carried on against the will of the people.

Edmund Burke

 

War People Will Say

The TV business is uglier than most things. It is normally perceived as some kind of cruel and shallow money trench through the heart of the journalism industry, a long plastic hallway where thieves and pimps run free and good men die like dogs, for no good reason.

Hunter S. Thompson

 

Good Business Heart Money

Objective journalism is one of the main reasons that American politics has been allowed to be so corrupt for so long.

Hunter S. Thompson

 

Politics Journalism American Corrupt

As long as I'm learning something, I figure I'm OK - it's a decent day.

Hunter S. Thompson

 

Learning Day Something OK Figure

I have long understood that losing always comes with the territory when you wander into the gambling business, just as getting crippled for life is an acceptable risk in the linebacker business. They both are extremely violent sports, and pain is part of the bargain. Buy the ticket, take the ride.

Hunter S. Thompson

 

Life Business You Ride

The best thing about the Kentucky Derby is that it is only two minutes long. It is the quickest event in sports, except for Sumo-wrestling & Mike Tyson fights. Maybe Drag-racing is quicker, but I have never been attracted to it.

Hunter S. Thompson

 

Best Sports Never Only

​

In all affairs it's a healthy thing now and then to hang a question mark on the things you have long taken for granted.

Bertrand Russell

 

You Question Things Now And Then

With the introduction of agriculture mankind entered upon a long period of meanness, misery, and madness, from which they are only now being freed by the beneficent operation of the machine.

Bertrand Russell

 

Agriculture Madness Introduction Only

The Marine Corps is the Navy's police force and as long as I am President that is what it will remain. They have a propaganda machine that is almost equal to Stalin's.

Harry S Truman

 

History Police I Am Will

Look at our society. Everyone wants to be thin, but nobody wants to diet. Everyone wants to live long, but few will exercise. Everybody wants money, yet seldom will anyone budget or control their spending.

John C. Maxwell

 

Money Society Look Nobody

The hate of men will pass, and dictators die, and the power they took from the people will return to the people. And so long as men die, liberty will never perish.

Charlie Chaplin

 

Hate Power People Men

The secret to a long marriage is to stay gone.

Dolly Parton

 

Marriage Secret Stay Gone

I try to see the good in everybody, and I don't care who people are as long as they're themselves, whatever that is.

Dolly Parton

 

Good People Care See

When I get down, I don't waller around for long.

Dolly Parton

 

Down Get Around

Someone once asked me, 'How long does it take to do your hair.' I said, 'I don't know, I'm never there.'

Dolly Parton

 

Me Hair Never Know

Remember, democracy never lasts long. It soon wastes, exhausts, and murders itself. There never was a democracy yet that did not commit suicide.

John Adams

 

Democracy Remember Never Suicide

Democracy... while it lasts is more bloody than either aristocracy or monarchy. Remember, democracy never lasts long. It soon wastes, exhausts, and murders itself. There is never a democracy that did not commit suicide.

John Adams

 

Democracy Remember Never Suicide

As much as I converse with sages and heroes, they have very little of my love and admiration. I long for rural and domestic scene, for the warbling of birds and the prattling of my children.

John Adams

 

Love Children Birds Rural

Since long I've held silence a remedy for harm.

Aeschylus

 

Silence Harm Remedy Since

If you only knock long enough and loud enough at the gate, you are sure to wake up somebody.

Henry Wadsworth Longfellow

 

You Gate Enough Wake Up

Perseverance is a great element of success. If you only knock long enough and loud enough at the gate, you are sure to wake up somebody.

Henry Wadsworth Longfellow

 

Success Perseverance You Great

I will continue doing things irrespective of the medium as long as I'm excited about it.

Sushant Singh Rajput

 

Will Doing Things Excited

During the year 1894, Pierre Curie wrote me letters that seem to me admirable in their form. No one of them was very long, for he had the habit of concise expression, but all were written in a spirit of sincerity and with an evident anxiety to make the one he desired as a companion know him as he was.

Marie Curie

 

Me Sincerity Know Habit

I don't mind living in a man's world as long as I can be a woman in it.

Marilyn Monroe

 

Man World Mind Woman I Can

Fame will go by and, so long, I've had you, fame. If it goes by, I've always known it was fickle. So at least it's something I experience, but that's not where I live.

Marilyn Monroe

 

You Experience Go Always

Nothing's ever easy as long as you go on living.

Marilyn Monroe

 

You Go Nothing Easy

Fame may go by and - so long, I've had you.

Marilyn Monroe

 

You Go Fame May

For a long time I was scared I'd find out I was like my mother.

Marilyn Monroe

 

Time Mother Long Time Like

I have been singing randomly, obsessively, obnoxiously for as long as I can remember.

Taylor Swift

 

Singing Remember I Can Been

I have a terrifying long list of fears. Literally everything - diseases, spiders... and people getting tired of me.

Taylor Swift

 

Me People Tired Getting

I am alone a lot, which is good. I need that time to just be alone after a long day, just decompress. So, I go to either my house or the hotel, or my apartment, or whatever - wherever I am, I go home and I watch TV and I sit there, with my cat, and I just watch TV or go online, check my emails.

Taylor Swift

 

Good Alone Time Home

When one side benefits more than the other, that's a win-lose situation. To the winner it might look like success for a while, but in the long run, it breeds resentment and distrust.

Stephen Covey

 

Success Look Situation Winner


You do things when the opportunities come along. I've had periods in my life when I've had a bundle of ideas come along, and I've had long dry spells. If I get an idea next week, I'll do something. If not, I won't do a damn thing.
Warren Buffett
 
   
Men of age object too much, consult too long, adventure too little, repent too soon, and seldom drive business home to the full period, but content themselves with a mediocrity of success.
Dale Carnegie
 
   

The United States has made serious mistakes in the conduct of its foreign affairs, which have had unfortunate repercussions long after the decisions were taken.
Nelson Mandela
 
   
If you are poor, you are not likely to live long.
Nelson Mandela
 
   
As long as poverty, injustice and gross inequality persist in our world, none of us can truly rest.
Nelson Mandela
 
   
As long as we persevere and endure, we can get anything we want.
Mike Tyson
 
    
When a man is out of sight, it is not too long before he is out of mind.
Victor Hugo
 
   

I don't mind what Congress does, as long as they don't do it in the streets and frighten the horses.
Victor Hugo
 
   
Despotism is a long crime.
Victor Hugo
 
 
I think long term you can see Tesla establishing factories in Europe, in other parts of the U.S. and in Asia.
Elon Musk
 
   
It's important that we attempt to extend life beyond Earth now. It is the first time in the four billion-year history of Earth that it's been possible, and that window could be open for a long time - hopefully it is - or it could be open for a short time. We should err on the side of caution and do something now.
Elon Musk
 
   
It's OK to have your eggs in one basket as long as you control what happens to that basket.
Elon Musk
 
   

If you go back a few hundred years, what we take for granted today would seem like magic - being able to talk to people over long distances, to transmit images, flying, accessing vast amounts of data like an oracle. These are all things that would have been considered magic a few hundred years ago.
Elon Musk
 
   
From an evolutionary standpoint, human consciousness has not been around very long. A little light just went on after four and a half billion years. How often does that happen? Maybe it is quite rare.
Elon Musk
 
   
Stationary storage will be as big as the car business long term. The growth rate will probably be several times what it is for the car business.
Elon Musk
 
   
Men are strong so long as they represent a strong idea they become powerless when they oppose it.
Sigmund Freud
 
   
We have long observed that every neurosis has the result, and therefore probably the purpose, of forcing the patient out of real life, of alienating him from actuality.
Sigmund Freud
 
   
Our care should not be to have lived long as to have lived enough.
Lucius Annaeus Seneca
 
   
As is a tale, so is life: not how long it is, but how good it is, is what matters.
Lucius Annaeus Seneca
 
   
The mind unlearns with difficulty what it has long learned.
Lucius Annaeus Seneca
 
  
As long as you live, keep learning how to live.
Lucius Annaeus Seneca
 
    
Not how long, but how well you have lived is the main thing.
Lucius Annaeus Seneca
 
   
Life, if well lived, is long enough.
Lucius Annaeus Seneca
 
   
The way is long if one follows precepts, but short... if one follows patterns.
Lucius Annaeus Seneca
 
   
Too long a sacrifice can make a stone of the heart. O when may it suffice?
William Butler Yeats
 
    
Life is a long preparation for something that never happens.
William Butler Yeats

I am of a healthy long lived race, and our minds improve with age. William Butler Yeats Age I Am Race Healthy If you've noticed that I don't use long takes, it's not because I don't like them, but because no one gives me the necessary means to treat myself to them. It's more economical to make one image, then this image and then that image, and try to control them later, in the editing studio. Orson Welles Myself Me You Editing Failure after long perseverance is much grander than never to have a striving good enough to be called a failure. George Eliot Good Perseverance Failure Never House guests should be regarded as perishables: Leave them out too long and they go bad. Erma Bombeck Go Bad House Leave As long as we are persistence in our pursuit of our deepest destiny, we will continue to grow. We cannot choose the day or time when we will fully bloom. It happens in its own time. Denis Waitley Future Time Day Persistence When from our better selves we have too long been parted by the hurrying world, and droop. Sick of its business, of its pleasures tired, how gracious, how benign is solitude. William Wordsworth Business World Tired Better Life is not long, and too much of it must not pass in idle deliberation how it shall be spent. Samuel Johnson Life Must Pass Too Much We are long before we are convinced that happiness is never to be found, and each believes it possessed by others, to keep alive the hope of obtaining it for himself. Samuel Johnson Hope Happiness Never Alive He that fails in his endeavors after wealth or power will not long retain either honesty or courage. Samuel Johnson Courage Power Honesty Will Surely a long life must be somewhat tedious, since we are forced to call in so many trifling things to help rid us of our time, which will never return. Samuel Johnson Life Time Never Will Friendship, like love, is destroyed by long absence, though it may be increased by short intermissions. Samuel Johnson Love Friendship Love Is Like No man, who continues to add something to the material, intellectual and moral well-being of the place in which he lives, is left long without proper reward. Booker T. Washington Man Reward Place Who It takes a long time to become young. Pablo Picasso Birthday Time Long Time Young Become Few women, I fear, have had such reason as I have to think the long sad years of youth were worth living for the sake of middle age. Dwight D. Eisenhower Sad Women Age Fear History does not long entrust the care of freedom to the weak or the timid. Dwight D. Eisenhower History Freedom Care Weak I like to believe that people in the long run are going to do more to promote peace than our governments. Indeed, I think that people want peace so much that one of these days governments had better get out of the way and let them have it. Dwight D. Eisenhower Peace People Believe Better I would rather try to persuade a man to go along, because once I have persuaded him, he will stick. If I scare him, he will stay just as long as he is scared, and then he is gone. Dwight D. Eisenhower Man Go Will Try One of my great goals in life is to live long enough to where I am in the pulpit, preaching my heart out, and I die on the spot, my chin hits the pulpit - boom! - and I'm down and out. What a way to die! Charles R. Swindoll Life Heart Great Goals If you believe that feeling bad or worrying long enough will change a past or future event, then you are residing on another planet with a different reality system. William James Change Future You Past The world is all the richer for having a devil in it, so long as we keep our foot upon his neck. William James Devil World Keep Neck Truth lives, in fact, for the most part on a credit system. Our thoughts and beliefs pass, so long as nothing challenges them, just as bank-notes pass so long as nobody refuses them. William James Truth Thoughts Challenges Nothing I live in Harlem, New York City. I am unmarried. I like 'Tristan,' goat's milk, short novels, lyric poems, heat, simple folk, boats and bullfights; I dislike 'Aida,' parsnips, long novels, narrative poems, cold, pretentious folk, buses and bridges. Langston Hughes Simple I Am City New Any action is often better than no action, especially if you have been stuck in an unhappy situation for a long time. If it is a mistake, at least you learn something, in which case it's no longer a mistake. If you remain stuck, you learn nothing. Eckhart Tolle You Time Mistake Better We have talked long enough in this country about equal rights. It is time now to write the next chapter - and to write it in the books of law. Lyndon B. Johnson Time Equality Law Country If pain could have cured us we should long ago have been saved. George Santayana Pain Us Should Been A soul is but the last bubble of a long fermentation in the world. George Santayana Soul World Bubble Last
Read more at https://www.brainyquote.com/topics/long-quotes_12


If we say it long enough eventually we're going to reap a harvest. We're going to get exactly what we're saying.
Joel Osteen
 
   
I don't focus on the critics. Everyone who is making any difference in any field has critics. As long as I feel like I'm doing what I'm supposed to be doing, then I don't worry about it.
Joel Osteen
 
   

Don't ever criticize yourself. Don't go around all day long thinking, 'I'm unattractive, I'm slow, I'm not as smart as my brother.' God wasn't having a bad day when he made you... If you don't love yourself in the right way, you can't love your neighbour. You can't be as good as you are supposed to be.
Joel Osteen
 
   
I'm healthy as can be - not an ache or a pain. A lot of my prayer is thanking the Lord that I am healthy. I pray for long life and good health.
Joel Osteen
 
   
Everything deep is also simple and can be reproduced simply as long as its reference to the whole truth is maintained. But what matters is not what is witty but what is true.
Albert Schweitzer
 
   
Serious illness doesn't bother me for long because I am too inhospitable a host.
Albert Schweitzer
 
   
If we long to believe that the stars rise and set for us, that we are the reason there is a Universe, does science do us a disservice in deflating our conceits?
Carl Sagan
 
   

A proverb is a short sentence based on long experience.
Miguel de Cervantes
 
   
Proverbs are short sentences drawn from long experience.
Miguel de Cervantes
 
   
He had read much, if one considers his long life; but his contemplation was much more than his reading. He was wont to say that if he had read as much as other men he should have known no more than other men.
Isaac Asimov
 
   
I don't expect to live forever, but I do intend to hang on as long as possible.
Isaac Asimov
 
   
America is not nearly done. We're only in the beginning. Who knows who we will be? Who knows... what color we will be? It is all something that, maybe, our descendants - if they survive that long - will see.
Alice Walker
 
   

For a long time, I thought I was ugly and disfigured. This made me shy and timid, and I often reacted to insults that were not intended.
Alice Walker
 
   
I think writing really helps you heal yourself. I think if you write long enough, you will be a healthy person. That is, if you write what you need to write, as opposed to what will make money, or what will make fame.
Alice Walker
 
   
How long will it take the citizens of the United States, one wonders, to recognize that the house their country bombed in Iraq is the same one they were living in until it was foreclosed?
Alice Walker
 
   
As long as the people don't fear the truth, there is hope. For once they fear it, the one who tells it doesn't stand a chance. And today, truth is still beautiful... but so frightening.
Alice Walker
 
   
Be amusing: never tell unkind stories; above all, never tell long ones.
Benjamin Disraeli
 
   

No Government can be long secure without a formidable Opposition.
Benjamin Disraeli
 
   
I have brought myself, by long meditation, to the conviction that a human being with a settled purpose must accomplish it, and that nothing can resist a will which will stake even existence upon its fulfillment.
Benjamin Disraeli
 
   
We have fought this fight as long, and as well as we know how. We have been defeated. For us as a Christian people, there is now but one course to pursue. We must accept the situation.
Robert E. Lee
 
   
Personal health is related to self-control and to the worship of life in all its natural beauty - self-control bringing with it happiness, renewed youth, and long life.
Maria Montessori
 
   
It is fortunate, I think, that nature is not bounded by human reason and by laboratory work and experimentation, for by the laws of pure reason and by microscopic investigation, it might easily have been proved, long before this, that children could not be born.
Maria Montessori
 
   
There's always been a lot of information about your activities. Every phone number you dial, every credit-card charge you make. It's long since passed that a typical person doesn't leave footprints.
Bill Gates
 
   
In the long run, your human capital is your main base of competition. Your leading indicator of where you're going to be 20 years from now is how well you're doing in your education system.
Bill Gates
 
   
The ability of a successful company to add functionality to its product has long been upheld.
Bill Gates
 
   
In order for the United States to do the right things for the long term, it appears to be helpful for us to have the prospect of humiliation. Sputnik helped us fund good science - really good science: the semiconductor came out of it.
Bill Gates
 
 t rap forever, but I know as long as I got a label or something I can get money forever. Lil Baby Money Know Forever I Can Opportunities are like sunrises. If you wait too long, you miss them. William Arthur Ward Morning You Wait Like Opportunities How long most people would look at the best book before they would give the price of a large turbot for it? John Ruskin Best People Look Book Whereas it has long been known and declared that the poor have no right to the property of the rich, I wish it also to be known and declared that the rich have no right to the property of the poor. John Ruskin Rich Wish Poor Right There is only one difference between a long life and a good dinner: that, in the dinner, the sweets come last. Robert Louis Stevenson Life Good Dinner Sweets So long as we are loved by others I should say that we are almost indispensable; and no man is useless while he has a friend. Robert Louis Stevenson Man Useless Friend Others You think dogs will not be in heaven? I tell you, they will be there long before any of us. Robert Louis Stevenson You Heaven Think Will
Read more at https://www.brainyquote.com/topics/long-quotes_14


Reagan was extreme. Beginning of his administration, one of the first things was to call in scabs - hadn't been done for a long time, and it's illegal in most countries - in the air controller strike.
Noam Chomsky
 
   
The doctrine that everything is fine as long as the population is quiet, that applies in the Middle East, applies in Central America, it applies in the United States.
Noam Chomsky
 
   

Egypt is the second-largest recipient over a long period of U.S. military and economic aid. Israel is first.
Noam Chomsky
 
   
Chemistry, until my childhood, not that long ago, was regarded as a calculating device. Because you couldn't reduce to physics. So it's just some way of calculating the result of experiments. The Bohr atom was treated that way.
Noam Chomsky
 
   
A very large majority of the U.S. population is in favor of establishing diplomatic relations with Cuba and has been for a long time with some fluctuations. And even part of the business world is in favor of it, too. But the government won't allow it.
Noam Chomsky
 
   
Over the years, there have been a series of concepts developed to justify the use of force in international affairs for a long period. It was possible to justify it on the pretext, which usually turned out to have very little substance, that the U.S. was defending itself against the communist menace. By the 1980s, that was wearing pretty thin.
Noam Chomsky
 
   
Popular struggles to bring about a freer and more just society have been resisted by violence and repression, and massive efforts to control opinion and attitudes. Over time, however, they have met with considerable success, even though there is a long way to go, and there is often regression.
Noam Chomsky
 
   

Iran has little capacity to deploy force. Its strategic doctrines are defensive, designed to deter invasion long enough for diplomacy to set it.
Noam Chomsky
 
   
It doesn't take long to become aware of the presence of the CIA in Laos.
Noam Chomsky
 
   
The original 'Hobbit' was never intended to have a sequel - Bilbo 'remained very happy to the end of his days and those were extraordinarily long': a sentence I find an almost insuperable obstacle to a satisfactory link.
J. R. R. Tolkien
 
   
Short cuts make long delays.
J. R. R. Tolkien
 
   
For most of us, wisdom is acquired in the thicket of experience and usually meets us somewhere along the way if we live long enough. But sooner is better than later.
H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
 
   

As long as I tell the truth I feel that nobody can touch me.
Henry Rollins
 
   
For a long time, when I was very young, I went to go see arena rock bands. I was 16, and it was all I could get in to see, legally. And I saw Led Zeppelin and Ted Nugent and Van Halen and all that.
Henry Rollins
 
   
Anything in this culture that stands still long enough eventually becomes okay if a person can derive an income from it. Eventually, pay-per-view public execution will happen, and it will be half-time entertainment.
Henry Rollins
 
   
I don't have a crystal ball, but I'm willing to bet one of my arms right now that as long as there's electricity, Ramones music is going to be relevant.
Henry Rollins
 
   
I'm not in a position where I get to pick and choose roles. I usually go on auditions in long lines and embarrass myself in front of casting directors, and with a lump in my throat and my ears burning, I walk past reception and smirking actors as I go to the parking garage and go back on the highway.
Henry Rollins
 
   

I am afforded a bit of easy wonderment in relative comfort as to how humans have lasted so long. Climate- and geography-wise, the planet seems to have little use for us.
Henry Rollins
 
   
My first visit to West Berlin was in February 1983. The drive through East Berlin, the fact that West Berlin was surrounded by a wall that was more than 100 miles long - the absurdity and intensity of it really knocked me out.
Henry Rollins
 
   
'Duck Dynasty' is a ridiculous show, and long may it wave. America and democracy will endure. They've seen a lot worse.
Henry Rollins
 
   
Mr. Christ, I read you as an infinitely patient entity who, as they say, often works in mysterious ways, a rebel unafraid to take the tougher, less traveled paths. Seems to me you're playing the long game. Is that why more states are coming out in favor of marriage equality? Is that why the Affordable Care Act is now with us?
Henry Rollins
 
   
For the last 30-plus years, I have been doing one long, uninterrupted improv.
Henry Rollins
 
   

I have been restless for as long as I can remember.
Henry Rollins
 
   
The opportunity to write for the 'L.A. Weekly' has been one of the better breaks that has come my way in a long time.
Henry Rollins
 
   
In many ways, America is on the receiving end of a pendulum that has been swung with great force, and for a long time, outward into the world. The impact is a wake-up call on every level.
Henry Rollins
 
   
I think it's fantastic when the young enrage their elders. I really do believe that if it's too loud, you are indeed too old, and that if it has been standing for too long, it needs a thorough inspection.
Henry Rollins
 
   

'SMiLE' is perhaps the Beach Boys' most legendary album. It was recorded in 1966 and 1967 but only saw a formal release in 2011. That's a long time to wait for what was said to be Brian Wilson's masterpiece.
Henry Rollins
 
   
I notice that young men go to the universities in order to become doctors or philosophers or anything, so long as it is a title, and that many go in for those professions who are utterly unfit for them, while others who would be very competent are prevented by business or their daily cares, which keep them away from letters.
Galileo Galilei
 
   

I can stand in a crystal stream without another human around me and cast all day long, and if I never catch a single fish, I can come home and still feel like I had a wonderful time. It's the being there that's important.
Norman Schwarzkopf
 
   
Most of the time it's the role. Sometimes it's the story and sometimes it just the paycheck. It's the little movies that come out as stories or the fact that I have work to go out, you know what I'm saying, you can only be out so long without work, you start getting antsy.
Morgan Freeman
 
   
I can only be so long without work before I start getting antsy.
Morgan Freeman
 
   
A wind has blown the rain away and blown the sky away and all the leaves away, and the trees stand. I think, I too, have known autumn too long.
e. e. cummings
 
   
Nothing is so discouraging to an actor than to have to work for long hours upon hours in brightly lighted interior sets.
John Wayne
 
   

Space is big. You just won't believe how vastly, hugely, mind-bogglingly big it is. I mean, you may think it's a long way down the road to the drug store, but that's just peanuts to space.
Douglas Adams
 
   
Books are sharks... because sharks have been around for a very long time. There were sharks before there were dinosaurs, and the reason sharks are still in the ocean is that nothing is better at being a shark than a shark.
Douglas Adams
 
   
The white usurpation in our common country must be stopped, or we, its rightful owners, be forever destroyed and wiped out as a race of people. I am now at the head of many warriors backed by the strong arm of English soldiers. Choctaws and Chickasaws, you have too long borne with grievous usurpation inflicted by the arrogant Americans.
Tecumseh
 
   
As this long and difficult war ends, I would like to address a few special words to the American people: Your steadfastness in supporting our insistence on peace with honor has made peace with honor possible.
Richard M. Nixon
 
   
In the long term we can hope that religion will change the nature of man and reduce conflict. But history is not encouraging in this respect. The bloodiest wars in history have been religious wars.
Richard M. Nixon
 
   

At home, we must reject the mistaken notion - a notion that has dominated too much of the public dialogue for too long - that ever bigger Government is the answer to every problem.
Richard M. Nixon
 
   
I asked long ago,'What must I do to be saved?' The Scripture answered, 'Keep the commandments, believe, hope, love.' I was early warned against laying, as the Papists do, too much stress on outward works, or on a faith without works, which as it does not include, so it will never lead to true hope or charity.
John Wesley
 
   
You always want to quit while you are ahead. You don't want to be like a fighter who stays too long in the ring until you're not performing at your best.
Clint Eastwood
 
   
The country has come a long way in race relations, but the pendulum swings so far back. Everyone wants to be so sensitive.
Clint Eastwood
 
   
I don't like to see a president who is just out campaigning all year long or for the last four years. I'd like to see somebody who's going in the office. In fact, I'd like to not see them because that way you'd be sure that they'd be working.
Clint Eastwood
 
   

As long as somebody finances you, can make a film and get it seen any place and in any language; then, hopefully, it's a success.
Clint Eastwood
 
   
So long as you have food in your mouth, you have solved all questions for the time being.
Franz Kafka
 
    
A mother's life, you see, is one long succession of dramas, now soft and tender, now terrible. Not an hour but has its joys and fears.
Honore de Balzac
 
   
I don't think that you can invent on behalf of customers unless you're willing to think long-term, because a lot of invention doesn't work. If you're going to invent, it means you're going to experiment, and if you're going to experiment, you're going to fail, and if you're going to fail, you have to think long term.
Jeff Bezos
 
   
When we build our own colonies, we can do them in near-Earth vicinity, because people are going to want to come back to Earth. Very few people - for a long time, anyway - are going to want to abandon Earth altogether.
Jeff Bezos
 
   

The monotony of a long heroic poem may often be pleasantly relieved by judicious interruptions in the perfect succession of rhymes, just as the metre may sometimes be adorned with occasional triplets and Alexandrines.
H. P. Lovecraft
 
   
We must realise that man's nature will remain the same so long as he remains man; that civilisation is but a slight coverlet beneath which the dominant beast sleeps lightly and ever ready to awake. To preserve civilisation, we must deal scientifically with the brute element, using only genuine biological principles.
H. P. Lovecraft
 
   
Denied anything ardently desired, the individual or state will argue and parley just so long - then, if the impelling motive be sufficiently great, will cast aside every rule and break down every acquired inhibition, plunging viciously after the object wished; all the more fantastically savage because of previous repression.
H. P. Lovecraft
 
   
The simple life on the farm was everything to me. Nothing was more relaxing after a long plane flight than to reach the winding driveway that led up to my house. The quiet of the night was more soothing than a sleeping pill.
Elisabeth Kubler-Ross
 
   

Death is staring too long into the burning sun and the relief of entering a cool, dark room.
Elisabeth Kubler-Ross
 
   
I'm afraid that if you look at a thing long enough, it loses all of its meaning.
Andy Warhol
 
    

I'm the type who'd be happy not going anywhere as long as I was sure I knew exactly what was happening at the places I wasn't going to. I'm the type who'd like to sit home and watch every party that I'm invited to on a monitor in my bedroom.
Andy Warhol
 
   
May you live as long as you wish and love as long as you live.
Robert A. Heinlein
 
   
Never worry about theory as long as the machinery does what it's supposed to do.
Robert A. Heinlein
 
   
A person who can write a long letter with ease, cannot write ill.
Jane Austen
 
   
He that will believe only what he can fully comprehend must have a long head or a very short creed.
Pierre Teilhard de Chardin
 
   

Long before the awakening of thought on earth, manifestations of cosmic energy must have been produced which have no parallel today.
Pierre Teilhard de Chardin
 
   
I have finally decided to write my book on the spiritual life. I mean to put down as simply as possible the sort of ascetical or mystical teaching that I have been living and preaching so long. I call it 'Le Milieu Divin,' but I am being careful to include nothing esoteric and the minimum of explicit philosophy.
Pierre Teilhard de Chardin
 
   
We spend our lives, all of us, waiting for the great day, the great battle, or the deed of power. But that external consummation is not given to many: nor is it necessary. So long as our being is tensed, directed with passion, towards that which is the spirit of all things, then that spirit will emerge from our own hidden, nameless effort.
Pierre Teilhard de Chardin
 
   
The body is forever teaching us lessons. There are all sorts of things that we can't do, shouldn't do, had better not do very often or do for too long as we get older. The body makes its presence known.
P. J. O'Rourke
 
   
Politicians are wonderful people as long as they stay away from things they don't understand, such as working for a living.
P. J. O'Rourke
 
   

I've only been to New Zealand once, about 1989. It was incredibly beautiful, kind of like the ideal of where I live in New England - all that and then some - but I can't say I was there long enough to get any very clear idea.
P. J. O'Rourke
 
   
The Communist bloc of old was a study in the failure of failure. Losers in the Soviet economy were the people at the end of the long lines for consumer goods. Worse losers were the people who had spent hours getting to the head of the line, only to be told that the goods were unavailable.
P. J. O'Rourke
 
   
Kabul is a walled city, which sounds romantic except the walls are pre-cast reinforced concrete blast barriers, 10 feet tall and 15 feet long and moved into place with cranes. The walls are topped with sandbags, and the sandbags are topped with guard posts from which gun barrels protrude.
P. J. O'Rourke
 
   
A deadly sins addendum is long overdue. Life has changed since Pope Gregory the Great scribbled his initial list in the sixth century.
P. J. O'Rourke
 
   
The idea that to make a man work you've got to hold gold in front of his eyes is a growth, not an axiom. We've done that for so long that we've forgotten there's any other way.
F. Scott Fitzgerald
 
   

All I know is what the words know, and dead things, and that makes a handsome little sum, with a beginning and a middle and an end, as in the well-built phrase and the long sonata of the dead.
Samuel Beckett
 
   
No, I regret nothing, all I regret is having been born, dying is such a long tiresome business I always found.
Samuel Beckett
 
   
No one lives long enough to learn everything they need to learn starting from scratch. To be successful, we absolutely, positively have to find people who have already paid the price to learn the things that we need to learn to achieve our goals.
Brian Tracy
 
   
There is only one thing that a man really wants to do, all his life; and that is, to find his way to his God, his Morning Star, salute his fellow man, and enjoy the woman who has come the long way with him.
D. H. Lawrence
 
   
So long as you don't feel life's paltry and a miserable business, the rest doesn't matter, happiness or unhappiness.
D. H. Lawrence
 
   

I've known from long ago that the universe was calling me. If you were one of those annoying adults that said, 'Oh, what are you gonna be when you grow up?' I would say, 'Astrophysicist.' And then they'd walk away real quickly.
Neil deGrasse Tyson
 
   
People generally don't recognize how long it takes to conceive, publish, and write a book.
Neil deGrasse Tyson
 
   
Just think for how long humanity was controlled by mystical, magical thinking - the diseases and suffering that led to. We managed to survive, but just barely. It wasn't pretty.
Neil deGrasse Tyson
 
   
It was unthinkable not long ago that a biologist or paleontologist would be at the same conference as an astrophysicist. Now we have accumulated so much data in each of these branches of science as it relates to origins that we have learned that no one discipline can answer questions of origins alone.
Neil deGrasse Tyson
 
   

I study the universe. It's the second oldest profession. People have been looking up for a long time.
Neil deGrasse Tyson
 
   
I been a long time leaving but I'm going to be a long time gone.
Willie Nelson
 
   

As long as there's a few farmers out there, we'll keep fighting for them.
Willie Nelson
 
   
I got along without you before I met you and I'll get along without you a long time after you're gone.
Willie Nelson
 
   
I started out really young, when I was four, five, six, writing poems, before I could play an instrument. I was writing about things when I was eight or 10 years old that I hadn't lived long enough to experience. That's why I also believe in reincarnation, that we were put here with ideas to pass around.
Willie Nelson
 
   
When poor people get involved in a long conflict, such as a strike or a civil rights drive, and the pressure increases each day, there is a deep need for spiritual advice. Without it, we see families crumble, leadership weaken, and hard workers grow tired.
Cesar Chavez
 
   
As long as we have a poor country bordering California, it's going to be very difficult to win strikes.
Cesar Chavez
 
   

If you're holding out for universal popularity, I'm afraid you will be in this cabin for a very long time.
J. K. Rowling
 
   
Many women long for what eludes them, and like not what is offered them.
Ovid
 
   
Let me tell you I am better acquainted with you for a long absence, as men are with themselves for a long affliction: absence does but hold off a friend, to make one see him the truer.
Ovid
 
   
Young people have decided they like to listen to music in a certain way, through ear buds, and that's fine with me as long as it doesn't bother them that they're not hearing 90 percent of the music that way.
Prince
 
   
I don't care if people think I am an overactor, as long as they enjoy what I do. People who think that would call Van Gogh an overpainter.
Jim Carrey
 
   

It was such a leap in my career when 'Truman Show' came along. It's always been a long process for me insofar as recognition goes, but that's OK because you appreciate it when it comes.
Jim Carrey
 
   
The intention to live as long as possible isn't one of the mind's best intentions, because quantity isn't the same as quality.
Deepak Chopra
 
   
As long as you think of your real self as the person you are, then of course you're going to be fearful of death. But what is a person? A person is a pattern of behavior, of a larger awareness. You know, the two-year-old dies before the three-year-old shows up, the three-year-old dies before the teenager shows up.
Deepak Chopra
 
   
Man, so long as he remains free, has no more constant and agonizing anxiety than find as quickly as possible someone to worship.
Fyodor Dostoevsky
 
   
As a boy, because I was born and raised in Ohio, about 60 miles north of Dayton, the legends of the Wrights have been in my memories as long as I can remember.
Neil Armstrong
 
   

By an irony of fate, my first employment was as a draughtsman. I hated drawing; it was for me the very worst of annoyances. Fortunately, it was not long before I secured the position I sought, that of chief electrician to the telephone company.
Nikola Tesla
 
   
Man, as long as he lives, is immortal. One minute before his death he shall be immortal. But one minute later, God wins.
Elie Wiesel
 
   
Progress might have been alright once, but it has gone on too long.
Ogden Nash
 
    
Every New Year is the direct descendant, isn't it, of a long line of proven criminals?
Ogden Nash
 
   
Death does not concern us, because as long as we exist, death is not here. And when it does come, we no longer exist.
Epicurus
 
   
I don't think you should write a book until you tell the absolute truth. You can't do that until you're 85, and I don't want to live that long. I've always prided myself on knowing when to get off, and I hope it works out that way.
Lucille Ball
 
   
I saw no African people in the printed and illustrated Sunday school lessons. I began to suspect at this early age that someone had distorted the image of my people. My long search for the true history of African people the world over began.
John Henrik Clarke
 
   
There are some long silences in Scandinavian and some Japanese films, when the audience knows action is taking place, but the audience hears no action.
John Henrik Clarke
 
   
Egypt gave birth to what later would become known as 'Western Civilization,' long before the greatness of Greece and Rome.
John Henrik Clarke
 
   

I caddied for Dwight Eisenhower and Omar Bradley long before they became generals or president, for that matter. Just between you and me, Bradley tipped better than Eisenhower did.
John Henrik Clarke
 
   
I often think that a slightly exposed shoulder emerging from a long satin nightgown packs more sex than two naked bodies in bed.
Bette Davis
 
   

It's been so long since I've had sex I've forgotten who ties up whom.
Joan Rivers
 
   
Show business is - you're there by somebody's fluke. And as long as somebody likes you, and the show is going well, you're fine. I'd do anything. There's so much I want to do.
Joan Rivers
 
   
As long as the reason of man continues fallible, and he is at liberty to exercise it, different opinions will be formed.
James Madison
 
   
Let me recommend the best medicine in the world: a long journey, at a mild season, through a pleasant country, in easy stages.
James Madison
 
   
Want to learn to eat a lot? Here it is: Eat a little. That way, you will be around long enough to eat a lot.
Tony Robbins
 
   

I still consider it a summer job, though. So, I try to maintain that summer job as long as I can. But it's exciting to be able to have the opportunity to do things I always dreamed of as a kid.
Jimmy Buffett
 
   
I knew the words to 25 rock songs, so I got in the group. Long Tall Sally and Tutti-Frutti, that got me in. That was my audition.
Paul McCartney
 
   
The Metropolis should have been aborted long before it became New York, London or Tokyo.
John Kenneth Galbraith
 
   
False facts are highly injurious to the progress of science, for they often endure long; but false views, if supported by some evidence, do little harm, for every one takes a salutary pleasure in proving their falseness.
Charles Darwin
 
   
Spoon feeding in the long run teaches us nothing but the shape of the spoon.
E. M. Forster
 
    

One always tends to overpraise a long book, because one has got through it.
E. M. Forster
 
   
Give me a lever long enough and a fulcrum on which to place it, and I shall move the world.
Archimedes
 
   
The entire world is my temple, and a very fine one too, if I'm not mistaken, and I'll never lack priests to serve it as long as there are men.
Desiderius Erasmus
 
   
Sure I believe in God and the Devil, but they don't have to have pitchforks and a long white beard.
Keanu Reeves
 
   
You can't grow long-term if you can't eat short-term. Anybody can manage short. Anybody can manage long. Balancing those two things is what management is.
Jack Welch
 
   

Management is all about managing in the short term, while developing the plans for the long term.
Jack Welch
 
   
It has long been an axiom of mine that the little things are infinitely the most important.
Arthur Conan Doyle
 
   
How many famous and high-spirited heroes have lived a day too long?
Jean-Jacques Rousseau
 
   
I long remained a child, and I am still one in many respects.
Jean-Jacques Rousseau
 
   
There are a group of people who would like to silence everybody and have everybody go along to get along, but that's not going to be very helpful for us in the long run, in terms of solving our problems. And somebody has to be courageous enough to actually stand up to, you know, the bullies.
Ben Carson
 
   

I believe that things are always going to work out, even if in the beginning it doesn't look like they are working out. I know in the long run they are going to work out, and it's going to be fine.
Ben Carson
 
   
When I entered high school I was an A-student, but not for long. I wanted the fancy clothes. I wanted to hang out with the guys. I went from being an A-student to a B-student to a C-student, but I didn't care. I was getting the high fives and the low fives and the pats on the back. I was cool.
Ben Carson
 
   
I have no problem whatsoever with allowing gay people to live as they please, as long as they don't try to impose their lifestyle on everyone else.
Ben Carson
 
   
Eternity is a mere moment, just long enough for a joke.
Hermann Hesse
 
   

It was morning; through the high window I saw the pure, bright blue of the sky as it hovered cheerfully over the long roofs of the neighboring houses. It too seemed full of joy, as if it had special plans, and had put on its finest clothes for the occasion.
Hermann Hesse
 
   
I think the best thing I can do is to be a distraction. A husband lives and breathes his work all day long. If he comes home to more table thumping, how can the poor man ever relax?
Jackie Kennedy
 
   

When I moved to L.A. in my early twenties, I was growing my hair. Then, when I was 25, I cut it off and was like, 'Oh no, I think I'm a long hair person until I go bald!'
Jonathan Van Ness
 
   
When you've been on Instagram and Twitter long enough, you know how mean people can be.
Jonathan Van Ness
 
   
For keeping hair long and healthy, I like to use silk pillowcases; they conduct less heat and keep your ends less frayed. Also, I sleep with my hair in a very loose top bun to keep my ends away from my body heat. This also keeps your hair from getting tangled at the nape of your neck.
Jonathan Van Ness
 
   
I wanted long hair my whole life. When I was a little kid, my mom would be like, 'We get our hair cut once a month.' So I just always got my hair cut.
Jonathan Van Ness
 
   
The second you're bleaching hair more than three or four levels on a consistent basis and want it long, and then you're heat styling it and living in the world - it's just impossible. You can get it there for a moment, and then you might get a couple re-touches out of it.
Jonathan Van Ness
 
   

Of course there are moments that you wonder how long you should be doing it because there are other aspects which are not nice, of this lifestyle. But I just love winning.
Ayrton Senna
 
   
Live all you can; it's a mistake not to. It doesn't so much matter what you do in particular, so long as you have your life. If you haven't had that what have you had?
Henry James
 
   
It seems sensible to me that we should look to the medical profession, that over the centuries has helped us to live longer and healthier lives, to help us die peacefully among our loved ones in our own home without a long stay in God's waiting room.
Terry Pratchett
 
   
The bravest person I've ever met was a young boy going through massive amounts of treatment for a very rare, complex and unpleasant disease. I last saw him at a Discworld convention, where he chose to take part in a game as an assassin. He died not long afterwards, and I wish I had his fortitude and sense of style.
Terry Pratchett
 
   
The thing is, 'Discworld' had been going on for a very long time, and I've written children's books as well. Usually when people have a really big series they franchise it, which I thought is a bit of a no-no, so I thought what I'd do is I'd franchise it to myself.
Terry Pratchett
 
   

In all seriousness, people think that it's the ideas that are important. Well, everyone has ideas, all the time. I tend to write mine down and remember them, but at some point you have to apply the bum to the seat and knock out about sixty five thousand words - that's how long a novel is.
Terry Pratchett
 
   
It's paradoxical, that the idea of living a long life appeals to everyone, but the idea of getting old doesn't appeal to anyone.
Andy Rooney
 
   
At the end of the day, the TV show is the best job in the world. I get to go anywhere I want, eat and drink whatever I want. As long as I just babble at the camera, other people will pay for it. It's a gift.
Anthony Bourdain
 
   
My brain and body and nervous system, they see a plane ride, a long plane trip, as an opportunity to sleep with nothing coming in, nothing to do. I just go offline the minute I'm on the plane.
Anthony Bourdain
 
   
I learned a long time ago that trying to micromanage the perfect vacation is always a disaster. That leads to terrible times.
Anthony Bourdain
 
   

I learned a long time ago in Hollywood that the only person I should vote for is myself.
Jack Nicholson
 
   
I don't mind how much my Ministers talk, so long as they do what I say.
Margaret Thatcher
 
   
He tosses aside his paint-pots and his words a foot and a half long.
Horace
 
   
It is of no consequence of what parents a man is born, as long as he be a man of merit.
Horace
 
   
No poems can please for long or live that are written by water drinkers.
Horace
 
   

No verse can give pleasure for long, nor last, that is written by drinkers of water.
Horace
 
   
You can't deny laughter; when it comes, it plops down in your favorite chair and stays as long as it wants.
Stephen King
 
   
For a long time all I wanted for Christmas were books about outdoor survival. I was convinced that the woods were calling me. I camped a lot, I took classes. At 18, I told myself if I don't live in the woods by myself by the time I'm 25, I have failed.
Chris Evans
 
   
There was one film that I really wanted. This was a long time ago; it was a film called 'Fracture.' Ryan Gosling ended up doing it with Anthony Hopkins. It wasn't a giant box-office success, but I really enjoyed the script, and I enjoyed the character. I got pretty close and was kind of disappointed it didn't go my way.
Chris Evans
 
   

I have often wondered what it is an old building can do to you when you happen to know a little about things that went on long ago in that building.
Carl Sandburg
 
   
I took to wearing a black tie known as the Ascot, with long drooping ends. I had seen pictures of painters, sculptors, poets, wearing this style of tie.
Carl Sandburg
 
   

But long story short, I didn't start doing stand-up because I wanted to have a TV show or be an actor or even wanted to write sketch comedy. I got into stand-up because I love stand-up.
Demetri Martin
 
   
If people take anything from my music, it should be motivation to know that anything is possible as long as you keep working at it and don't back down.
Eminem
 
   
I want to keep making records as long as I can, but I don't know how long you can be taken seriously in rap.
Eminem
 
   
I do say things that I think will shock people. But I don't do things to shock people. I'm not trying to be the next Tupac, but I don't know how long I'm going to be on this planet. So while I'm here, I might as well make the most of it.
Eminem
 
   
I have long enjoyed the friendship and companionship of Republicans because I am by instinct a teacher, and I would like to teach them something.
Woodrow Wilson
 
   

Character is simply habit long continued.
Plutarch
 
  
Those whose life is long still strive for gain, and for all mortals all things take second place to money.
Sophocles
 
   
Beware, so long as you live, of judging men by their outward appearance.
Jean de La Fontaine
 
    
It doesn't matter what you believe just so long as you're sincere.
Charles M. Schulz
 
   
As long as the world is turning and spinning, we're gonna be dizzy and we're gonna make mistakes.
Mel Brooks
 
   

I'll accept bad taste in a minute, as long as there's some great comedy minds and performances.
Mel Brooks
 
   
I will do this job as long as I feel that I can do it full steam.
Ruth Bader Ginsburg
 
   
We've come a long way from the days where there was state-enforced segregation. But we still have a way to go.
Ruth Bader Ginsburg
 
   
There are some singers that know exactly when to go, and others hang on much too long and that is the same, that is the same with judges.
Ruth Bader Ginsburg
 
   
Inspirations never go in for long engagements; they demand immediate marriage to action.
Brendan Behan
 
   

As long as your body is healthy and under control and death is distant, try to save your soul; when death is immanent what can you do?
Chanakya
 
   
In waking a tiger, use a long stick.
Mao Zedong
 
   
Investigation may be likened to the long months of pregnancy, and solving a problem to the day of birth. To investigate a problem is, indeed, to solve it.
Mao Zedong
 
   
I'm in politics to change things - if possible, for the better. I was a journalist for a long time, but I had a kind of midlife crisis, and I decided I needed to do something to get on the pitch and stop endlessly kicking over other peoples' sandcastles.
Boris Johnson
 
   
Too many Christians have a commitment of convenience. They'll stay faithful as long as it's safe and doesn't involve risk, rejection, or criticism. Instead of standing alone in the face of challenge or temptation, they check to see which way their friends are going.
Charles Stanley
 
   

The time you spend alone with God will transform your character and increase your devotion. Then your integrity and godly behavior in an unbelieving world will make others long to know the Lord.
Charles Stanley
 
   
As long as I play ball, I can get any woman I want.
Dennis Rodman
 
   
For years the league has thought I've been on drugs. I would have burned out a long time ago if that was true.
Dennis Rodman
 
   
Every individual acts and suffers in accordance with his peculiar teleology, which has all the inevitability of fate, so long as he does not understand it.
Alfred Adler
 
   

Popular Topics
Popular Authors
More
People who attend support groups who have been diagnosed with a life-challenging illness live on average twice as long after diagnosis as people who don't.
Marianne Williamson
 
   
I've known Dennis Kucinich for a long time, and I don't think I have illusions about him. Sometimes I find him pompous, male chauvinistic, intellectually unbending. But he is a good man, and a serious one.
Marianne Williamson
 
   

Flattery is all right so long as you don't inhale.
Adlai Stevenson I
 
   
The life so short, the crafts so long to learn.
Geoffrey Chaucer
 
   
While one man can discover a certain thing by himself, another is never able to understand it, even if taught by means of all possible expressions and metaphors, and during a long period; his mind can in no way grasp it, his capacity is insufficient for it.
Maimonides
 
   
The only freedom which deserves the name is that of pursuing our own good, in our own way, so long as we do not attempt to deprive others of theirs, or impede their efforts to obtain it.
John Stuart Mill
 
   
As long as justice and injustice have not terminated their ever renewing fight for ascendancy in the affairs of mankind, human beings must be willing, when need is, to do battle for the one against the other.
John Stuart Mill
 
   

It was simple reality - most competitive tennis players in my day were privileged, spoiled, entitled and white. Also, many of them were beautiful, fit, tan and of good stock - great big hair and white teeth and long legs. Then there were the rest of us.
Anne Lamott
 
   
I would seriously rather be in a long line at the DMV than eat with people I don't know.
Anne Lamott
 
   
Summer nearly does me in every year. It's too hot and the light is unforgiving and the days go on way too long.
Anne Lamott
 
   
Most of me was glad when my mother died. She was a handful, but not in a cute, festive way. More in a life-threatening way, that had caused me a long time ago to give up all hope of ever feeling good about having had her as a mother.
Anne Lamott
 
   
I've never been one to look up the ladder. I've always looked down the ladder. As long as there's one guy down there, I'm fine.
Ron White
 
   

If you look at the common denominator of all the comics who have had big success, it's being true to their nature... that's what takes a long time to learn.
Ron White
 
   
I don't have a specific plan except for as long as people want to listen to me talk, I'm going to keep talking. I can't imagine a life without doing standup.
Ron White
 
   
As long as I stay engaged with everybody else, then I'll create more comedy. It's just when I shut off and stay at home... What helps me is just to keep moving.
Ron White
 
   
If I'm in a town for very long, usually I'll work out in the comedy club just to keep my chops or work out the beats on new stuff.
Ron White
 
   
Voltaire lighted a torch and gave to others the sacred flame. The light still shines and will as long as man loves liberty and seeks for truth.
Robert Green Ingersoll
 
   

As long as the people persist in voting for or against men on account of their religious views, just so long will hypocrisy hold place and power.
Robert Green Ingersoll
 
   
There are times when a falsehood well told bridges over quite a difficulty, but in the long run, you had better tell the truth, even if you swim the creek.
Robert Green Ingersoll
 
   
Custom is a prison, locked and barred by those who long ago were dust, the keys of which are in the keeping of the dead.
Robert Green Ingersoll
 
   
As long as we can get redress in the courts, as long as the laws shall be honestly administered, as long as honesty and intelligence sit upon the bench, as long as intelligence sits in the chairs of jurors, this country will stand, the law will be enforced, and the law will be respected.
Robert Green Ingersoll
 
   
I decided long ago never to walk in anyone's shadow; if I fail, or if I succeed at least I did as I believe.
Whitney Houston
 
   

In grammar school some of the girls had problems with me. My face was too light. My hair was too long. It was the black-consciousness period, and I felt really bad.
Whitney Houston
 
   
Jack Benny was, without a doubt, the bravest comedian I have ever seen work. He wasn't afraid of silence. He would take as long as it took to tell the story.
Bob Newhart
 
   
I think you should be a child for as long as you can. I have been successful for 74 years being able to do that. Don't rush into adulthood, it isn't all that much fun.
Bob Newhart
 
   
You're not dead at 85. You're a long way from it. Go out and enjoy. You've earned it.
Bob Newhart
 
   

Getting an audience is hard. Sustaining an audience is hard. It demands a consistency of thought, of purpose, and of action over a long period of time.
Bruce Springsteen
 
   
An outgrowth of having a long career is that I have a lot of interesting things around that I get to revisit, and someday get to the place where they become something that I want to do next.
Bruce Springsteen
 
   

I think there's only eight songs on 'Born to Run' - I don't think it's much more than 35 minutes long. But as you move into it, where every song comes up in the sequence makes a lot of sense - though we weren't thinking about it; we were going on instinct at the time.
Bruce Springsteen
 
   
There is no disguise which can hide love for long where it exists, or simulate it where it does not.
Francois de La Rochefoucauld
 
    
Quarrels would not last long if the fault was only on one side.
Francois de La Rochefoucauld
 
   
We seldom find people ungrateful so long as it is thought we can serve them.
Francois de La Rochefoucauld
 
   
The mind cannot long play the heart's role.
Francois de La Rochefoucauld
 
   

It is not in the power of even the most crafty dissimulation to conceal love long, where it really is, nor to counterfeit it long where it is not.
Francois de La Rochefoucauld
 
   
The first lover is kept a long while, when no offer is made of a second.
Francois de La Rochefoucauld
 
   
Tortoises can survive for weeks without food or water, easily long enough to float in the Humboldt Current from South America to the Galapagos Islands.
Richard Dawkins
 
   
The history of science has been one long series of violent brainstorms, as successive generations have come to terms with increasing levels of queerness in the universe.
Richard Dawkins
 
   
I'm fascinated by the idea that genetics is digital. A gene is a long sequence of coded letters, like computer information. Modern biology is becoming very much a branch of information technology.
Richard Dawkins
 
   

If women are supposed to be less rational and more emotional at the beginning of our menstrual cycle when the female hormone is at its lowest level, then why isn't it logical to say that, in those few days, women behave the most like the way men behave all month long?
Gloria Steinem
 
   
You can compel fear. You can even make someone feel they're in love if they're isolated and dependent for long enough. But laughter is free.
Gloria Steinem
 
   
I was never against marriage per se. Before feminism, I didn't think you had any choice. In fact, for a long time I always assumed I would get married. I just didn't see any marriages I wanted to emulate, so I kept putting it off.
Gloria Steinem
 
   
Perhaps McCain has opposed affirmative action for so long that he doesn't know it's about inviting more people to meet standards, not lowering them.
Gloria Steinem
 
   
As long as working women also have to do the work of child and family care at home, they will have two jobs instead of one. Perhaps more important, children will grow up thinking that only women can be loving and nurturing, and men cannot.
Gloria Steinem
 
   

Mama grizzlies mate later than other bears. They have two cubs instead of four. They wait four years - about twice as long as other bears - between having cubs. And after they're pregnant, if winter is hard or their health is not good or the food supply is uncertain, they re-absorb the embryo into their body.
Gloria Steinem
 
   
Simple goes a long way.
Bad Bunny
 
   
In most things success depends on knowing how long it takes to succeed.
Montesquieu
 
   
Success in the majority of circumstances depends on knowing how long it takes to succeed.
Montesquieu
 
   
The success of most things depends upon knowing how long it will take to succeed.
Montesquieu
 
   

My wife doesn't care what I do when I'm away, as long as I don't have a good time.
Lee Trevino
 
   
There are two things that won't last long in this world, and that's dogs chasing cars and pros putting for pars.
Lee Trevino
 
   
So what do we do? Anything. Something. So long as we just don't sit there. If we screw it up, start over. Try something else. If we wait until we've satisfied all the uncertainties, it may be too late.
Lee Iacocca
 
   
The most successful businessman is the man who holds onto the old just as long as it is good, and grabs the new just as soon as it is better.
Lee Iacocca
 
   

Ministers should not pray so loud, and long, as to exhaust the strength. It is not necessary to weary the throat and lungs in prayer. God's ear is ever open to hear the heart-felt petitions of his humble servants, and he does not require them to wear out the organs of speech in addressing him.
Ellen G. White
 
   
I only type every third night. I have no plan. My mind is a blank. I sit down. The typewriter gives me things I don't even know I'm working on. It's a free lunch. A free dinner. I don't know how long it is going to continue, but so far there is nothing easier than writing.
Charles Bukowski
 
   

I grew up with all mothers, all women. I come from a long line of matriarchs, very strong women.
Erykah Badu
 
   
I have lived too long to cherish many illusions about the essential high-mindedness of men when brought into stark confrontation with the issue of control over their security, and their property interests.
Haile Selassie
 
   
We have before us the examples of the U.S.A. and the U.S.S.R. We must remember how long these required to achieve their union. When a solid foundation is laid, if the mason is able and his materials good, a strong house can be built.
Haile Selassie
 
   
Wayne and Drake, it takes them so long to do a song. I understand why, because they want it to be perfect. But I think I can do a perfect song in 10 minutes.
Young Thug
 
   
I did this book 'Harvest for Hope,' and I learned so much about food. And one thing I learned is that we have the guts not of a carnivore, but of an herbivore. Herbivore guts are very long because they have to get the last bit of nutrition out of leaves and things.
Jane Goodall
 
   

I learned from my dog long before I went to Gombe that we weren't the only beings with personalities. What the chimps did was help me to persuade others.
Jane Goodall
 
   
As long as habit and routine dictate the pattern of living, new dimensions of the soul will not emerge.
Henry Van Dyke
 
   
Time is too slow for those who wait, too swift for those who fear, too long for those who grieve, too short for those who rejoice, but for those who love, time is eternity.
Henry Van Dyke
 
   
I don't even listen to peoples' music… I'm really in-tune with my craft, I listen to me all day long.
DaBaby
 
   
I think when I was young, let's call it high school, and even before that, I just loved comedy, and I loved comedians. I grew up watching Laurel and Hardy. That's really a long time ago. I loved Jerry Lewis. I just loved comedians.
Steve Martin
 
   

Senator Kerry has been in Washington long enough to take both sides on just about every issue.
George W. Bush
 
   
I cast my bread on the waters long ago. Now it's time for you to send it back to me - toasted and buttered on both sides.
Jesse Jackson
 
   
There's great disparity between who goes to college and who goes to jail. Who lives long and who dies prematurely, is the defining issue of our time. And I submit to you, there's a significant race dimension, it is basically class-driven.
Jesse Jackson
 
   
We blacks were the first people embracing Obama, long before the people at expensive fundraisers were supporting him. We gave him his first love, 96 percent of blacks voted for him in 2008. Yet today we are the number one in unemployment, with 16 percent of American blacks out of work.
Jesse Jackson
 
   
Who lives long and who dies prematurely, is the defining issue of our time. And I submit to you, there's a significant race dimension, it is basically class-driven.
Jesse Jackson
 
   

For a long time I was convinced that the conflict between Jewish people and black people in this country was a media event.
Toni Morrison
 
   
Schools must stop being holding pens to keep energetic young people off the job market and off the streets. We stretch puberty out a long, long time.
Toni Morrison
 
   
Sailed this day nineteen leagues, and determined to count less than the true number, that the crew might not be dismayed if the voyage should prove long.
Christopher Columbus
 
   
When we long for life without difficulties, remind us that oaks grow strong in contrary winds and diamonds are made under pressure.
Peter Marshall
 
   
Civil rights leaders, including my husband and Albert Turner, have fought long and hard to achieve free and unfettered access to the ballot box. Mr. Sessions has used the awesome power of his office to chill the free exercise of the vote by black citizens in the district he now seeks to serve as a federal judge.
Coretta Scott King
 
   

In the area of economic justice, we still have a long way to go. We have too many people who are discriminated against just because they happen to be black or they happen to be a woman or some other minority.
Coretta Scott King
 
   
You only have power over people so long as you don't take everything away from them. But when you've robbed a man of everything, he's no longer in your power - he's free again.
Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn
 
   
A man is happy so long as he chooses to be happy and nothing can stop him.
Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn
 
   
Human beings yield in many situations, even important and spiritual and central ones, as long as it prolongs one's well-being.
Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn
 
   

The history of science has been one long series of violent brainstorms, as successive generations have come to terms with increasing levels of queerness in the universe.
Richard Dawkins
 
   
I'm fascinated by the idea that genetics is digital. A gene is a long sequence of coded letters, like computer information. Modern biology is becoming very much a branch of information technology.
Richard Dawkins
 
   

God is not asking you to be anything other than what he's made you, as long as you submit to how he has made you, to how you relate to other people who he has made different than you.
Tony Evans
 
   
Im afraid that when it comes to the Christian life, and especially the issue of assurance, too many of us adopt the Barney Fife approach. That is, we let the enemy bully us into believing that were only safe as long as were wearing our Christian 'uniform.'
Tony Evans
 
   
In the urban community, the church doesn't just take people to Heaven; it feeds, clothes, and houses them. It teaches them how to read and gets them jobs. The church should be doing all that. What the government should be doing is freeing up the church and supporting the church, as long as it is providing social services.
Tony Evans
 
   
As long as the world shall last there will be wrongs, and if no man objected and no man rebelled, those wrongs would last forever.
Clarence Darrow
 
   
Civil rights leaders, including my husband and Albert Turner, have fought long and hard to achieve free and unfettered access to the ballot box. Mr. Sessions has used the awesome power of his office to chill the free exercise of the vote by black citizens in the district he now seeks to serve as a federal judge.
Coretta Scott King
 
   

In the area of economic justice, we still have a long way to go. We have too many people who are discriminated against just because they happen to be black or they happen to be a woman or some other minority.
Coretta Scott King
 
   
It is more fun to talk with someone who doesn't use long, difficult words but rather short, easy words, like 'What about lunch?'
A. A. Milne
 
   
Senator Kerry has been in Washington long enough to take both sides on just about every issue.
George W. Bush
 
   
It is not all bad, this getting old, ripening. After the fruit has got its growth it should juice up and mellow. God forbid I should live long enough to ferment and rot and fall to the ground in a squash.
Josh Billings
 
   
I have lived in this world just long enough to look carefully the second time into things that I am most certain of the first time.
Josh Billings
 
   

Life is short, but it's long enough to ruin any man who wants to be ruined.
Josh Billings
 
   
I only type every third night. I have no plan. My mind is a blank. I sit down. The typewriter gives me things I don't even know I'm working on. It's a free lunch. A free dinner. I don't know how long it is going to continue, but so far there is nothing easier than writing.
Charles Bukowski
 
   
As long as man continues to be the ruthless destroyer of lower living beings he will never know health or peace. For as long as men massacre animals, they will kill each other.
Pythagoras
 
   
It was simple reality - most competitive tennis players in my day were privileged, spoiled, entitled and white. Also, many of them were beautiful, fit, tan and of good stock - great big hair and white teeth and long legs. Then there were the rest of us.
Anne Lamott
 
   
I would seriously rather be in a long line at the DMV than eat with people I don't know.
Anne Lamott
 
   

Summer nearly does me in every year. It's too hot and the light is unforgiving and the days go on way too long.
Anne Lamott
 
   
Most of me was glad when my mother died. She was a handful, but not in a cute, festive way. More in a life-threatening way, that had caused me a long time ago to give up all hope of ever feeling good about having had her as a mother.
Anne Lamott
 
   
Flattery is all right so long as you don't inhale.
Adlai Stevenson I
 
   
Well, my friend, this earth will one day be that cold corpse; it will become uninhabitable and uninhabited like the moon, which has long since lost all its vital heat.
Jules Verne
 
   
As long as a man's heart beats, as long as a man's flesh quivers, I do not allow that a being gifted with thought and will can allow himself to despair.
Jules Verne
 
   

It doesn't matter what you believe just so long as you're sincere.
Charles M. Schulz
 
   
Welcome anything that comes to you, but do not long for anything else.
Andre Gide
 
   
One does not discover new lands without consenting to lose sight of the shore for a very long time.
Andre Gide
 
    
It is good to follow one's own bent, so long as it leads upward.
Andre Gide
 
   

There are big countries and small countries, rich and poor, those with long democratic traditions and those still finding their way to democracy.
Vladimir Putin
 
   
In the 20th century, the Soviet Union made the state's role absolute. In the long run, this made the Soviet economy totally uncompetitive. This lesson cost us dearly. I am sure nobody wants to see it repeated.
Vladimir Putin
 
   

That's the most important thing to me - that if I'm gonna spend however long it takes to make a movie, give up 14 hours a day for however many weeks or months, then it's very important for me to know that I'm working with people who I respect and enjoy and that we're going for something together.
Brad Pitt
 
   
If I'm gonna spend however long it takes to make a movie, give up 14 hours a day for however many weeks or months, then it's very important for me to know that I'm working with people who I respect and enjoy and that we're going for something together.
Brad Pitt
 
   
John Glenn's life will long be remembered for his time in space, his courage, and his service to all Americans.
Katherine Johnson
 
   
Hip-hop from the beginning has always been aspirational. It always broke that notion that an artist can't think about money as well. Just so long as you separate the two and you're not making music with business in mind. At some point, it has to be real when they touch it, when they listen to it. Something has to resonate with them that's real.
Jay-Z
 
   
I like long walks, especially when they are taken by people who annoy me.
Noel Coward
 
    

I learned a long time ago in Hollywood that the only person I should vote for is myself.
Jack Nicholson
 
   
As long as the world is turning and spinning, we're gonna be dizzy and we're gonna make mistakes.
Mel Brooks
 
   
I'll accept bad taste in a minute, as long as there's some great comedy minds and performances.
Mel Brooks
 
   
It's important to slow down, every now and then, for no other reason than to call someone to say 'Hi.' It doesn't have to be a long conversation. Just calling out of the blue does more to let someone know you still care about them than nearly anything else.
Simon Sinek
 
   
I'm a fan of the kind of political correctness that is about not promoting prejudice. But some people in America are offended by equality because when you've had privilege for so long, equality feels like oppression.
Ricky Gervais
 
   

I don't mind what people say about me as long as it's an opinion or the truth. If someone says, 'He's the worst comedian in the world,' that's fine. If someone says, 'His face makes me want to punch the TV,' that's fine. But if they say, 'Oh, and I know for a fact he hunts squirrels,' I go: no, no, no... that's a lie.
Ricky Gervais
 
   
A couple of people I knew went to university apart from me, but all the way through I was the smartest kid in the school. That's luck, but I was proud of it. And I was also proud of doing well without trying. As you get older, and it took me a long time to realise it, that's a disgusting attitude, revolting.
Ricky Gervais
 
   
Every man desires to live long, but no man wishes to be old.
Jonathan Swift
 
   
In Hollywood, the women are all peaches. It makes one long for an apple occasionally.
W. Somerset Maugham
 
   
I made up my mind long ago that life was too short to do anything for myself that I could pay others to do for me.
W. Somerset Maugham
 
   

Old age is ready to undertake tasks that youth shirked because they would take too long.
W. Somerset Maugham
 
   
We have long passed the Victorian Era when asterisks were followed after a certain interval by a baby.
W. Somerset Maugham
 
   
Anger will never disappear so long as thoughts of resentment are cherished in the mind. Anger will disappear just as soon as thoughts of resentment are forgotten.
John Dryden
 
   
You can scream at me, call me for a shoot at midnight, keep me waiting for hours - as long as what ends up on the screen is perfect.
Arnold Schwarzenegger
 
   
The mind is the limit. As long as the mind can envision the fact that you can do something, you can do it, as long as you really believe 100 percent.
Arnold Schwarzenegger
 
   

As long as I live, I will never forget that day 21 years ago when I raised my hand and took the oath of citizenship. Do you know how proud I was? I was so proud that I walked around with an American flag around my shoulders all day long.
Arnold Schwarzenegger
 
   
A career is something that you train for and prepare for and plan on doing for a long time.
Sonia Sotomayor
 
   
I do think there is a value in the services of judges for long periods of time.
Sonia Sotomayor
 
   
I don't know, as long as I get to evolve and grow as an actor and as a person, that's the stuff I'm after.
Heath Ledger
 
   
Long Quotes - Page 31
Popular Topics
Popular Authors
More
The reason that you dance and sing is to make the audience feel like they're dancing and singing. As long as you're having fun with it and giving it 100 percent, they're gonna feel that.
Heath Ledger
 
   
I'm not resigned, but I'm realistic too. The statistics in my case are very poor. Not many people come through esophageal cancer and live to talk about it, or not for long. And the other wager is, the part of the wager, it's a certainty you'll have a terrible time and you may wish you were dying because it's an awful process.
Christopher Hitchens
 
   

Not many people come through esophageal cancer and live to talk about it, or not for long.
Christopher Hitchens
 
   
Like the experience of warfare, the endurance of grave or terminal illness involves long periods of tedium and anxiety, punctuated by briefer interludes of stark terror and pain.
Christopher Hitchens
 
   
I boldly assert, in fact I think I know, that a lot of friendships and connections absolutely depend upon a sort of shared language, or slang. Not necessarily designed to exclude others, this can establish a certain comity and, even after a long absence, re-establish it in a second.
Christopher Hitchens
 
   
As a company, we have to be very transparent. We are in a business very related to finance, and I want this company to last long, and I want this company to be audited by everyone.
Jack Ma
 
   
Time is long but life is short.
Stevie Wonder
 
   

You can do 'Hamlet' while performing cartwheels... as long as the audience sees your eyes - you can make the performance real.
James Dean
 
   
Time always seems long to the child who is waiting - for Christmas, for next summer, for becoming a grownup: long also when he surrenders his whole soul to each moment of a happy day.
Dag Hammarskjold
 
   
So long as a person is capable of self-renewal they are a living being.
Henri Frederic Amiel
 
   
I don't want to wake up and be bored. That's probably my greatest fear is to have nothing to do. What better job is there than to play quarterback for an NFL team, and certainly one that I've been on for a long time and had success with? I don't plan on giving it up any time soon.
Tom Brady
 
   
Fortunately for a quarterback, you can play for a long time because you don't get hit very often.
Tom Brady
 
   

You know, watching Dan Marino and Steve Young get nominated to the Hall of Fame... those guys are unbelievable and they did it for so long. I'd love to play like those guys, but there's still a long way to go and a lot of growing.
Tom Brady
 
   
The biggest issue is muscle pliability. That's what I think the biggest secret to me is. What is muscle pliability? Muscle pliability is keeping your muscles long and soft.
Tom Brady
 
   
Because my career is so important, I think I make a lot of - I wouldn't call them sacrifices, but just concessions for my job. I love what I do, and I want to do it for a long time.
Tom Brady
 
   
I don't even know what the issues are. I haven't paid attention to politics in a long time. It's actually not something that I really even enjoy. It's way off my radar.
Tom Brady
 
   
I try to encourage all my teammates, and I sure hope that some day all athletes - my kids, high school kids - get the same level of care I get. Because you can play for a long period of time without having knee replacements, without having all the major head trauma that people are dealing with.
Tom Brady
 
   

I'd be so bored if I wasn't going out there, knowing that I could still do it. So, I'm going to work hard to be ready to go, and I still plan on playing for a long time.
Tom Brady
 
   
I don't believe you could be a 39-year-old quarterback in the NFL and eat cheeseburgers every day. I want to be able to do what I love to do for a long time.
Tom Brady
 
   
Progress was all right. Only it went on too long.
James Thurber
 
    
There is something about a poet which leads us to believe that he died, in many cases, as long as 20 years before his birth.
James Thurber
 
   
Man has gone long enough, or even too long, without being man enough to face the simple truth that the trouble with man is man.
James Thurber
 
   

A play is basically a long, formalistic polemic. You can write it without the poetry, and if you do, you may have a pretty good play. We know this because we see plays in translation. Not many people speak Norwegian or Danish or whatever guys like Ibsen spoke, or Russian - yet we understand Chekhov and the others.
David Mamet
 
   
As a child, I watched 'Dallas' and that was my vision for my life for as long as I could remember.
Will Smith
 
   
The enemy fought with savage fury, and met death with all its horrors, without shrinking or complaining: not one asked to be spared, but fought as long as they could stand or sit.
Davy Crockett
 
   
There should not be one new dime in tax breaks for millionaires and billionaires as long as millions of children in America are poor, hungry, uneducated and without health coverage.
Marian Wright Edelman
 
   
